Good lord.  Yes.
I don't know about that...
Explain something about Israel in simple terms?   No.
I would add that the 'more exercise' part shouldn't be more squats. Instead, do some cardio that requires all the muscles to work. Swimming is great to just get the muscles some air. Running, kayaking, jumping jacks, ect. Nothing that is going to be too harsh on the quads.   When the muscles get sore, it is an easy excuse to 'rest.' However exercise is the better option and actually helps the soreness go away faster. 
care to explain #4 ? is it a dead end? no longer actively developed? 
A society where the main focus is to get out of Earth and explore the vast reaches of space
Normally, when I see bad effects I don't think "I could do that better." I am not an effects guy, and my photoshop mastery only goes so far when it comes to motion. This is different. I think, given an hour or so to familiarize myself with the programs, I could do this.   My favorite part was the use of emboss on the alien tripod thing. That was super classy.
No one wants to talk about how this is widely considered cheating? I am genuinely shocked.
I don't get it. 
I wonder whether you pretend to not understand or if you really are that stupid.  Clue: lifting people out of poverty does not require coal.
I would suggest just getting a laptop. Since you want to write, it would really be easier to use something with the actual keyboard and not worry about touchscreens. I've tried writing on an iPad for notes, and it was frustrating, but that's me. It might work for you just fine.   I can't answer the first two, but I know that it is a pain to use the touchscreen for copying and pasting and whatever. I *think* you can print as well.   I say get a laptop, but you should wait until someone else posts here agree/disagreeing with me. I'm not too familiar with the iPad.
Remember, don't curl the tire. Put your chest against it and push through with your hips like a clean.
I made it [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/California/comments/icye3/attempt_3_at_a_new_logo_this_time_i_incorporated/), but nobody seemed to like it.
I think you may have a problem.
Not clever but "I am a leaf on the wind..."  or "if you can't stand you crawl.  And if you ..."  or however that went. 
Aww, very nice! How much did you sell it for? I'd love to buy one if you make any more.
Wow! Thanks! I think you mean [http://www.sinfest.net](http://www.sinfest.net) though, instead of ".com"
I read the title and thought of that cheating bitch clown from the glassjaw video
so your server has rules and you choose to break them?
Manufacturers war - LOVED IT!
[](/stare) wait*
The guy in the video actually said "urine has no bacteria, no viruses".
Because you're about to wash your hands, but not your feet.
The director can........Walk With Me In Hell  http://instantyeah.org/
Lumps. You don't want lumps on your balls.
That is spelled "V-O-I-L-A!". meaning "Here it is!" in French.  I wanted to know who Viola is (a firstname that is). But thanks for the chicken.
No, not at all! I was just being silly. I love this kind of stuff and making it so that my eyes won't bleed anymore as a result of staring at a screen is a good thing!
I really love my ATRIX 4G I'm with bell right now and it is actually my first cellphone I looked around before buying it and I don't regret my choice. The Atrix is a super fast phone dual core is a really plus and works great with games and apps so far.   It comes with MOTOBLUR  ( you can remove all the crazy widget and motoblur by rooting your phone) and the boot loader is locked ( but suppose to be unlock in july with a 2.3.2 update ). The Battery life on my part is OK , if you use your phone as a GPS make sure to buy the car charger because it drains the battery very very fast.   The camera is 5mp the quality is decent its not as good as other phones out there but still really nice, small tweaks and correction in photoshop sometimes is needed.   I bought this [Skin](http://www.skinomi.com/motorola-atrix-4g-carbon-fiber-skin-protector.html) for my phone it's a techskin from skinomi it comes with the screen protector also. It's a manipulable skin that you apply on your phone that hardens around it, the shield on the screen is self healing. I did not want to buy these rubbery feeling it makes the phone thicker and also I am careful to not drop it on the ground.  The phone comes with 16gb internal memory you can also expend with micro SD card which is definitely a plus imo. The finger print scanner is really nice sometimes it can be annoying because it wont read if you scan to fast or short other than that it's a nice feature.
i was going to come in just to say this. 
Thanks, I had *just* forgotten about this movie.
Got anything with a high-speed space battle vibe? Possibly something similar to Newshit but with a harsher feel.  I'm trying to finish this:  [http://www.swfcabin.com/open/1309475536](http://www.swfcabin.com/open/1309475536)  (Warning: It doesn't have a preloader. Give it a second to load)
*'Lindsay Lohan'd'*
Also Dos-a-rita. pour a big frozen margarita and stick a dos equis amber in upside down, letting it mix with the rita bit by bit as you drink. phenomenal.
Is your username a reference to something?
All he had was a college id. You're supposed to have a government issued photo id where the name matches exactly the name on the boarding pass. I'd say the blame should fall squarely on the TSA. If I can't even go to the gate anymore to meet people coming into town how the hell do they explain him getting all they way onto a plane before anyone notices?
I concur with this. Plus £12.50 seems a bit steep. Funtcase is from my town and plays there every few weeks and it is usually £3 or £4 to see him along with some great local talent. Not only that the club is in a small basement with a Funktion 1 system and they go crazy with about 4 stacks of 18" woofers so the bass is crazy. We have this one DJ who does mental crossovers between fidget and the more chilled out dubstep, unbelievable stuff, I think he's called Shark Bait, he also has his own range of t-shirts called Yoghurt Warrior, they're great too.
Yes, I truthfully believe that 16GB of DDR3 RAM operating at what most motherboards have as the highest native speed (1600) should be sufficient.
I'm hoping if he gets elected again he'll get shit done since he won't have the re-election to worry about. 
har har. No, I mean that was the littlest of things that could set me off. Crowds, talking to people, leaving my room was difficult.  I retreated into my cave for a little while, licked my wounds, and now I'm back. A little older, a little scarred, but way more wise, and stronger.
I've heard all about the Robinson family. I hit $2 buckets of balls a few times a week at the Kukiolono golf course in Kalaheo where you can actually see Ni'ihau, and I've never heard of this. That's pretty crazy.
It's like the built a baseball field in a warehouse.
Because it is a realistic Borderlands with HUGE textures?
Flushing with your foot means you don't have to touch the flusher with your hands.  It's a rather selfish way to flush though :&gt;
...that is pretty brilliant...
Yes. Every 5 mins or so.
What do you mean "maybe not"?  You understand that effects have causes, correct? Causality is valid to you, right? For there to be a Big Bang, you would need all the matter and energy in the universe (they could be the same) available and some input of force to bang it apart.
Reading all these replies makes me appreciate being single.
I'm an elections official.  And I brew beer.
Why the downvotes? I LOL'd.
Touché, but I think not all seeing eye dogs might be trained like this.  My dad has one and yes it is trained to follow certain voice commands, but I've never heard him give him the "poop" command lol. When he's at work, the dog just knows that when they go outside on my dad's lunch break, it's business time. When he is at home the dog will just start hanging out by the door like most dogs will.
Neat! ::takes picture::
We also have 2000 years of tech on the Romans.
First, I said "primary purpose" not "only purpose." And second, I agree, it is a slip up, because it is more likely that someone sneaking onto a plane has a nefarious purpose than someone who is riding with a ticket. My main point is that the title is hyperbolic. This is not proof that the TSA is an illusion of security. This is a story about how the TSA screwed up at one of their secondary functions. 
I too bursted out the birf canal the week of February 21, 1987! YAY!
Really?
Hey, look on the bright side: you can build a pretty sweet [board track racer](http://3.bp.blogspot.com/_aY_xPgkgrpo/TNGvjGz_eII/AAAAAAAAFnY/N7AiNzklqTo/s1600/board+track+racer.jpg) with that stance. 
I grew up in Texas. When I was a kid, everyone I met with a Southern accent was uneducated, didn't have a lot of money, and were born and died in the same small town. Folks I met without an accent tended to listen to better music, go to college, and get better jobs.  So who do you think I emulated? I didn't say "y'all" until I left the state, and it no longer felt like a mark of undereducation.  I am without a doubt Texan. But there's a lot of ways to be Texan. I picked one I like, and for good reasons. That doesn't make me any less Texan than Joe Six Pack in his doublewide.   Is race that different? Can't you retain the culture you like and toss what you don't, without being a traitor to your family? (That said, it probably ain't good to feel "superior" to people who didn't make your same choices)
In a networking class.... "what do you do if someone pings you? Do ya ping em back and shove spam down their throat?"
The word itself isn't bad for me, but I really hate the way it's being used, as if being a "gamer" is part of an exclusive club of some sort.
I came here to share that song because I am sure it would've gotten me some easy Karma points... but I saw this. I'm happy for you! :)
He doesn't seem to be that great of a photography professor. 
Thus proving my point: whatever justification you have for believing in a god comes after you decided that there is a god.
It's the beginning of the end.
People entire save files got corrupted.  Luckily enough that was also able to be fixed.  But that's still a pretty damn poor effort on Mojangs part.  I just don't understand how they can implement a feature and not take the 5 minutes it would take to actually make sure it even bloody works.
i figured i had all night.  hindsight is 20/20. you are right though.  next time i will have her over to my place.  not fun.
I did this already! [Here's the link](http://www.reddit.com/r/California/comments/icye3/attempt_3_at_a_new_logo_this_time_i_incorporated/)
Nice. I like both. 
Technically they *DO* exist, but only to those that follow a religion that defines them and uses that terminology.
Well I'll be darned, you're right, of course.  My bad. 
Redditors, we are everywhere...
Never heard of Medicaid?
Is being an obnoxious misanthrope a prerequisite to becoming a judge or is it just a bonus?
I wrote it.  I'll walk on your damn lawn if I please.
Although I love AJ, she isn't my favorite (that'd be Pinkie). However, I have recently moved from Tennessee to Pennsylvania, and I find that her Southern drawl/her family's hospitality brings up fond memories from the South and all the people I met there. I also like that her personality reminds me of my uncle, who happens to be from the south (the "I can and will do this, no one help me!" attitude). 
[I had Photoshop open at the time.](http://i.imgur.com/idM5y.png)  Also,   [](/c16"That toddler dresses better than me.")
Really? Sounds like he sarcastically pushed for a broad allowance of non-disclosure - and seriously won. If I'm reading [this article](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2011/06/30/stephen-colbert-super-pac_n_887851.html) right it means News Corp. doesn't have to report shit. Someone please tell me I'm wrong. I hope I'm misinterpreting here.
didn't notice the second one.  I'm glad you pointed it out.  Despite being aimed at me, I lol'd :)
&gt;I  think the majority of Christians don't read the bible  FTFY
Rofl, sounds legit
Agreement, but this doubles as 'timing' too. You need to be in time or you need to not be playing. You need to be playing in time with the drums AND making sure what you're playing is locked into the drums, or you need not be playing. 
No hipsters? Curse my beard and penchant for for cardigans!
Peanuts, pretty sure it's peanuts. 
No.  Bad.  No cookie.
Ctrl-F: *drr* *drr* *drr*...
Damn. I was wrong. I remember this comedy duo that did a sketch where one of them was a "turkey-slapper" who fetishistically slapped turkey and the other was, I think, a "ham-toucher," and each thought the other was weird. I've been trying for years to find them back, and thought I'd lucked out. Oh well.
Excuse me?  Did you, or did you not say, "there's no way to know." Did you, or did you not use 1 million km as your example?  I took the example you provided, shredded it with 2 simple facts that any high school graduate should know, then you claim you didn't give the example to begin with?  That's really sad.  I agree, no point continuing this.  For the record, here is the original quote:  &gt; I will give few examples: scientists set facts based on what they can see/test, if we say there is a planet that is 100 year light away. We are assuming here that the light travels at the same speed in space as it does on earth. what if it turns out that light (weakens) after the first 1000,000 KM and starts to drop in spead? there is no way for us to know for sure.   PLONK!
If people knew that downvoting raised the popularity, they might think twice about it.
Midna, of course! Not in little person/creature form. Princess form. Hot!
As a non-american, wtf?
Get a job before leaving your current job.  What field are you in?
Me too. :/
Exactly like air-drying your balls.
&gt;He hasn't made out with me since we were dating, claiming it was too weird for him.  My gay-dar is going off here.  Eitherway the guy is clearly an inconsiderate asshole. He does not care about your feelings. He care's more about indulging his own righteous assholery than making you feel better when you're crying. This isn't marriage material. This isn't even one night stand material.  Throwing an ultimatum at him is a terrible idea. At best all that will do is convince him to pretend to be nice for a time, thus lengthening your misery. He shouldn't need to be threatened with divorce to treat you like a decent human being, let alone a loving partner.   You're still young. Ditch him like a ton of bricks and fucking run.  Also now you know why it's a dumb idea to get married in your early 20s, cause it makes bailing out on shitty relationships like this that much harder. No relationship ever ended cause they were too happy together but they just didn't have the right marriage certificate, but plenty of people are kept in shitty relationships way past their sell by date because being married makes bailing out of a shitty relationship seem a lot worse than it actually is.
X-2 had a fantastic and addictive battle system and I loved the jobs, but man that story was a hot mess : /
[There are probably more germs on these handles...](http://lost100pounds.files.wordpress.com/2011/05/chinese_buffet.jpg)
She's a very nice lady.  kinda boring but nice.
looks like a sad walrus to me...
Touche.
Already brought up [in another thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/technology/comments/idouo/has_anyone_else_seen_this_apparently_new).
Clearly rotten tomatoes viewpoint is irrelevant. 
fuck everything about this
The *charge* was brought where the government *alleges* he made the call.
 Well, its just that I have to imagine it would be hard to actually understand the story. Other than that....Hell Yeah! Malkavians!
I don't know, but my Indian friend showed me this little gem today.  http://www.immihelp.com/newcomer/american-culture-and-behavior.html.  As an American, I found some of it true, and some of it hysterically funny. 
This is awfully blurry. What is he doing?
I'd love a portrait! [Here is me with a pipe!](http://www.321cheese.com/img_xpUhm15VFO50.png)  edit: I saw you ask for higher resolution images to get the facial structure right. Here are [two](http://i.imgur.com/oagMJ.jpg) more [pictures](http://i.imgur.com/CoErO.jpg) (no need to include my Chinese student if you choose the former).  As for questions: What kind of pencil are you using for these? Do you have any general tips for people just starting to learn, especially for capturing a person's likeness?
shiny vagina
So then people won't even realize they're using it.  I wonder what happens if someone switches their SIM from their iPhone to another phone and another iPhone user tries to send them a message.  How quickly will it swtich to SMS?
respect to newcastle for their no jacket no shirt policy 
I keep a $2 bill in my wallet at all times.  For some reason it makes me feel special.
At HCL consulting for USF in Rosemont.  User Interface Software Architect.  Hanging in Park Ridge since it's near the parks to go photo aminals and stuff.   http://i.imgur.com/YwsC4.jpg  http://i.imgur.com/ptw8D.jpg  http://i.imgur.com/grcp8.jpg
upvoted anyway
A good man (Y) no problem friend, It's unfair to take other people's karma
I had bad shin splints until I started rolling out my calves with a homemade foam roll, once in the morning and once in the evening.  I took a 2-foot section of 4" PVC and wrapped a 1/2" thick exercise mat once around it, taping it all down with vinyl tape.  My foam roll works perfectly.
[The Daikaiju Who Loved Me](http://grooveshark.com/#/s/The+Daikaiju+Who+Loved+Me/1Z94lq?src=5) - Daikaiju (57 plays)  Cecilia Ann - The Ramblin' Ambassadors (52 plays; best version of this song I've heard, but I can't find the recording of it anywhere on the net.)  [Hangin' Tree](http://grooveshark.com/#/s/Hangin+Tree/3uzpk4?src=5) - The Ramblin' Ambassadors (41 plays)  [Densmore](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=O9bNWMa5-2w) - Anamanaguchi (33 plays)  [All the Way to the Edge of This World](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=K1dCOjLsMIA) - the pillows (27 plays)
Can I have an invite? Please!
It seems to me that coming out as an atheist would be easier, as atheism itself is already mainstream in most industrialized, and the U.S. is heading in that direction. Although those same industrialized nations are mainstream atheist, they don't have a homosexual majority as they do an atheist majority. That makes it easier to come out as atheist in the U.S.;  you have a strong numerical amount backing you up, even if it's across the ocean. Slight, but major difference.
Bitch, is that an egg? Not any more. Now it's a zygote.
It was a bad day when I realized why my mother cared so much if she said she was going to bed and my dad didn't follow.
Thank you for the tip. :)
You want Jekyll, but you don't want Hyde.  Alas, it's a package deal.  Love cannot cure illness.  If he shows interest in seeking assistance with his mental illness, he might be worth keeping an eye on IF the situation continues of you not being interested in anyone else.  But it would be disastrously foolish to put your life on hold for him.
Hey there,  I recommend this guide for modding: http://forums.somethingawful.com/showthread.php?threadid=3310676  I think it may be worth trying out some mods on your first playthrough. At the very least, a user interface mod is a great idea because the vanilla UI is awful.  I also don't like how vanilla Oblivion handles leveling, for a bunch of reasons.  1. Since the world levels up with you, you don't feel like you get stronger over time. I think that's pretty lame - why level when you don't get stronger relative to your environment?  2. If you don't level efficiently, you can get underpowered. To level efficiently you have to be aware of what skills you need to "level" on your way to leveling to get maximum attribute bonuses while not wasting potential levels for future bonuses. But I don't enjoy that process - I want to do things because I want to role play them, not so that my character remains viable. The other workaround for this is to choose useless skills as your major skills so that you can control when to level. That's no fun either; I want to start with higher levels in the skills I will actually use!  To get around these problems, I like having a mod that gives creatures a static level (OOO, Francescos) and that changes the leveling scheme so that I pick what I want to improve when I level, so that I can do whatever I feel like doing (Oblivion XP, gives you experience for lots of things you do, and you appropriate points when you level, Fallout style).  I also highly recommend Deadly Combat - it gives much more depth to the combat system and makes it a lot more fun. Consider other mods if they interest you!  Also, be sure to CAREFULLY read installation instructions for all mods or Oblivion will crash a lot. And that's frustrating.
Why are you concerned about him purposely misleading the public?  What is the worse that can happen?  He doesn't have the force of government behind him to do anything?  Don't forget both democrats and republicans passed the patriot act and extensions.  Democrats and republicans put the lives of americans in jeopardy.  Glenn beck is an insignificant person.  Do you even recall any of the rhetoric from the 40's calling for hearings after the Po river disaster?  Do you know what the papers said about Spain in the late 19th century?  How about those copperheads.  People come and go, laws stay.  You are afraid, but can't admit it.
Cowboy boots  Work boots  Denim jeans (even though both of those words originate in Europe)  Tee shirts  Ball caps  I don't know, I could probably be wrong with origin, but that stuff is pretty classic.
Who pronounces "sore" like "saw"?
I'm mostly referring to news content. BBC, Al Jezeera, NYT, LA Times, etc. 
Bask in the glorious repost karma! **BASK I SAY!**
We could solve unemployment now by paying half of the unemployed to dig up the sand on the west coast, and move it to the east coast, while paying the other half to do the opposite thing.  FULL EMPLOYMENT!  Good economics isn't about jobs, it is about production. The military is millions of people using resources to break other resources.   If the military industrial complex was ended tomorrow, we would have near the same wealth in the country, but a lot more unemployed. When these guys get jobs, and perhaps use their factory equipment for consumable goods/etc, we would be better off for it.
The one good thing about working retail or whatever is the odd hours make it easier to go to interviews for the "real" jobs (when/if you eventually get one)
How did you do that?
I can haz google+ kthx?
No, on the frontside of the MB, following along where the MB and back of chassis meet just under the slot plates and under the vid card then into the plug on the board.
What kind of pen do you use?
It puts the karma in the basket.
All the fucking time. Because they're amazing. Especially when combined with infestors. In fact one of my flaws I think is that I stay on Tier 2 for too long and forget to go for them.
If you have ever smelled the inside of a goodwill, this should not be surprising in the least...
"He's already angry; I might as well be away from the mouth."
it's called exercising people.. if you do it hard enough you'll get wide shoulders.. dunno about the hands dough.. family thing?
To each his own. I'm in the "every little bit helps" camp, I guess. :D
My sincerest hope is that at my funeral, someone will get up and say to all my friends and family, "Yeah, that guy was a total dick."
teleporting kills you....so either way you're dead...might as well get as much more livin' in as you can. 
I was going to suggest "Look how stupid I made these Redditors look" as the title, but I felt like it was a gimme.
I actually decided recently to test myself and make sure I'm not an addict. I was consistently smoking about a half pack a day. I'm about 3.5 days clean now and I've heard that after a couple of weeks the smell of cigarettes starts to really become unpleasant to you. I'm going to give it three weeks and see if I care to start smoking again.  Anyways, I started smoking shortly after I started drinking. I was drunk, friends smoked, offered me one, I said fuck it and tried it. And I enjoyed it. So the next time I tried two. Then I bought my own pack and smoked it over a few parties. Then I smoked while sober. Then I smoked while sober again. Then finally I was buying three or four packs a week and had to admit that I officially qualified as a "smoker".  To be honest though, smokers get way too much flak for their habit. Lay off a bit haters.
I do housing legal work. Keep the mutually signed copy of your lease handy; maybe make an extra copy to be safe. As long as you have that document you will be fine. The lease is the legal contract between you and the LL, and he is not allowed to ask for rent that is not specified in the lease.
I think the downvoating roman would have some harsh words to say to you right now.
[Relevant](http://www.explosm.net/comics/101/)......Though such behavior is pretty much molestation and I cannot condone it.
Solution: Install a security chip in the "cable", and make the computer not operate without the loop closed.  Then you can make it as flimsy as you wish, or even retractable.
Have you talked at all about counseling?  Is he willing?  I'm not saying don't throw in the towel.  But things might work out if you both go to counseling separately for awhile and then eventually together.
Sucks to be you man, shit on one of them while the cameras are there. Sure to make an impact.
[](/stare)
professional to me means something that was clearly thought out and not just slapped on dafont. that almost always means money. I would want the tattoo on the left side of my chest and not terribly big. that is cool you do not like them, do you have any similarish fonts you would recommend?
Months?  That's an eternity in electronics. By the time you decide whether or not to bring it into your stores, it's outdated.
my Fav sc2 song
why would you pick flax if you have 230m
Is that the Reddit Alien in Shamu's vagina?
If I were asked to make a list of my most-listened-to-albums of the past 10 years, Ratatat's first two albums would rank up there.  However, I have yet to purchase their later albums.  From what I have heard from them, they began embracing a sound closer to Thievery Corporation than to the guitar-driven and song-based rock of their first two albums.  I'm excited to see them at Lolla this year, but I am curious if I am the only one to *love* their earlier work and ignore their later work.  One last thought: the new Bon Iver is great.  I didn't listen to it before its release date, so I'm still savoring all the sounds on it.
From twenty paces, directly at the lower body of your dueling partner
agreed
Animals as leaders are worth a listen.
&gt; That's trending towards **NSFL**  FTFY. *(pukes)*
Just thought I'd add that swallowing isn't fully tied to the taste of something. Some people can't psychologically swallow things like sugar coated pills. They also start to gag if they try.  I don't know how you were are as a child but I remember my siblings and myself always hated taking syrupy medicine. Just the texture and thought of, "I HAVE to swallow this" made it way more difficult.  I imagine all of this could be applied to swallowing ejaculate. It's a strange taste and a strange consistency, so sure they have already tasted it but physically/mentally they won't be able to swallow it.
Thanks for the support! Here's [an attempt](http://www.reddit.com/r/California/comments/icye3/attempt_3_at_a_new_logo_this_time_i_incorporated/) at the bear though.
I wish you could link to the latest copy of jquery via google cdn and not have to update each time
about 2500lbs lighter than the equivalent scene in the usa
i respectfully disagree, kitsu does make an important point. the recent politics announcement states this:  &gt; Editorialisation of titles will be extremely frowned upon now. For example, "Terrorist group bombs Iranian capital" will be more preferable than "Muslims bomb Iran! Why isn't the mainstream media reporting this?!". Do try to keep your outrage confined to comment sections please.  framing the debate from the outset is good, but not in the title.  that aside, this is an interesting submission. i wonder if there has been a president and secretary of defence of the united states *not* involved in managing an existing war or launching another one. if war extends to the covert influencing/initiation/financing of foreign conflicts, then surely no president or secretary has had entirely clean hands, and any freedom/peace overtures will seem hollow. but if war is an extension of diplomacy (or was it the other way around), then it is a reality that a person in a position of power has to confront, and there is a possibility that someone fundamentally rational and peace-loving  (if such a person exists) will have to, in some circumstances, make some pretty tough decisions either extending an existing conflict or initiating another one. i would hope that this person has explored every possible avenue short of war/conflict, and i have no reason to believe either obama or gates, as seemingly rational people, have not done the same.  now on to gates. i know very little about him, but i remember hearing a speech of his to a conference some years ago and he seemed like a character out of a le carré novel, murky by virtue of his stint in the cia (and iran contra if i'm not mistaken) but also very straightforward, funny and seemingly decent. how decent is something difficult to know given his line of work, but he seems to command the respect and sympathy of a broad spectrum of people, which is surprising given how polarized the u.s. seems from the outside.
It seems to me that the government of Israel may not control them in the sense of *planning* their movements, but it does issue building permits, authorize the settlements, and provide them with military support and defense.  How should I view that if not as explicit sponsorship?
I'm up in the keweenaw peninsula pretty much year round.
I know.  Lame, huh?
Surely you can't be serious. Airplane! What is it? It's a fun movie that is filled with really dumb jokes that will always make me laugh, but that's not important right now.
I saw them live with Katatonia last year and was HORRIBLY disappointed. I must say they are definitely an album band. Live they sounded weak, sloppy and uninspired.
fuck.
You can enjoy the core game for as long as you like, and the moment you feel like moving on, oh hey, wait a minute, there are all these different ways to enjoy this game now.  Maybe you want to fly a speeder over Hoth blasting away at AT-AT's with the frostbite engine? Or play capture the flag? Or clever custom maps? Or any other sort of thing one might find fun. These things are simply added bonuses.
SMOKE SUPER MEDICINAL CANNABIS. NO BIG PHARMA POISON
I didn't do it for the free room-and-board; my parents were paying for that anyway. I did it because I thought it would be a good experience.  Man.... was *that* a naive, stupid idea.  I like 'res life' a whole lot more when they were still called 'housing' and their buildings were still called 'dormatories', not 'residence halls'.
There's always worse.  1) Christopher Cross - Best That You Can Do  2) The Rolling Stones - Start Me Up  3) Daryl Hall &amp; John Oates - Private Eyes  4) Sheena Easton - For Your Eyes Only  5) Diana Ross &amp; Lionel Richie - Endless Love  At least there's some Stones, but rather shitty as far as The Stones go.
I got my invite, but it doesn't work yet. Nervous!
This sounds better than my Mac singing the same thing to this date.
Israel handled it way better this time than last time. 
Yeah, I'm ruler guilty! I am practicing straight lines (doing some of the only exercises I can recall from middle school art classes) but I had such a clear idea of what I wanted to do...  As for the darkness of the lines, I was completing this at work so I could use their scanner- and we don't have any pencil sharpeners. I killed that pencil. I plan on fixing that up later. Thanks for the feedback!
I just found out that instead of paying my power bill this month, they owe me thirty dollars credit and I don't pay again until next month. And I get paid today. So I have a hundred dollars I normally wouldn't have on the day I find out about Steam Summer Sale? FUCK YES.
Biscuit base.
Compared with most fandoms where there are definite fan favorites and the characters they barely put up with, Bronies as a whole seem to love the main cast just about equally. The EqD poll hardly showed a plurality. There are camps behind each pony, but most agree that the show is better for having all of the mane 6 there.  Now, if you include minor characters (some bronies seem to have an odd thing for Trixie) and fan creations things get a little messy. They only exist in my head, but Lyra and Bon Bon are best ponies :D.
Can't you just block them?  In the 'Circles' main page there is a category for 'People who've added you'.  Just select whoever &gt; more options &gt; block.
You and your bunny stock photos can fuck off.
July 29-31
Hope you can't wait to wear your pockets inside out too.
This is one of the best ohffseasons ever.
STRENGTH AND HONOR! 
Tree outlines a baby...
Ratatouille :)
I clicked chrome ext on that page and it downloaded firefox ext instead.
What the hell, I'll throw myself into the mix. Here's two potential pictures for you, feel free to make take some artistic liberties with them ;) [Pic 1](http://imgur.com/2RGUm)  [Pic 2](http://imgur.com/B3MzY)
"Thomas Jefferson explained the latter general welfare clause for the United States: “[T]he laying of taxes is the power, and the general welfare the purpose for which the power is to be exercised. They [Congress] are not to lay taxes ad libitum for any purpose they please; but only to pay the debts or provide for the welfare of the Union. In like manner, they are not to do anything they please to provide for the general welfare, but only to lay taxes for that purpose.”[7]"  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/General_Welfare_clause#United_States  The Federal Government MUST promote the general welfare and DO SOMETHING about this TREND of NONSENSE, REIGN IN the DOGS.  The officers are in VIOLATION of the GENERAL WELFARE CLAUSE and must be PROSECUTED in FEDERAL COURT.
I can tell it took you a while to make the latter half of that comment, so upvote for your efforts.
Bare with me here...I would do off with people that bring more bad to the world than good: anybody with a below average IQ (even if I am one of em, so be it), education system modifications (people should be allowed to specialize at a much younger age--I am an engineer and have wanted to be one since freshman year, I didn't need to waste so much of my life learning French, which I know I will never use), I am not entirely an athiest, more agnostic, but I would do off with religions because they bring a LOT more hell to earth than good, I would make sure everyone would be taught open-mindedness so they would have their own opinions (not the opinion of God or what their parents told them--there would be a more sexually open lifestyle and more drug oriented, but only on safe drugs like LSD, Marijuana, etc.). It would be the United States of the World. All one country, entirely democratic.
Also *The Joke* is pretty misogynistic in my opinion.
~~Yes please!~~
So much rage.
He actually played incredibly well for that entire tournament, the problem that I see is that his style has always been gateway-centric, and that was the last tournament before the KA nerf. Since losing the ability to warp-in storms San simply hasn't been playing as well, although I obviously can't say that's the sole reason.
Yeah, otherwise the CIA agents illegally occupying Libya might get exposed while trying to put a coup d'etat into place, right?  "No troops on the ground" indeed !  It was pretty embarrassing when George Tenet got awarded the Medal of Freedom after the CIA, DoD and FBI let 9/11 happen, too.  But I guess him and the CIA took the whole blame for all those lies about WMDs, right?  I guess the CIA just can't exist in this day and age without a big PR makeover.  Oh, and when the CIA didn't figure out that Pakistan and India were developing nuclear weapons.  Talk about embarassing!  It's almost like the CIA doesn't do anything but collect big fat lumps of money and surf the internet all day.  So I see what you're getting at, General Petraeus is needed because otherwise the CIA just looks like a bunch of incompetent spooks.
Flood the hole with said soup and see if it eventually backs up. If it does not, then chances are something is on the other side. 
i think the biggest surprise here, and i think every redditor will agree with me, is that you turned out to be a man...
This is true....only if you're North American.
Woot! I got an invite!! Many thanks to the glorious OP!!  Google+ still not allowing for new joiners for now, it seems.
Yup, that's it.
I got dibs on the humidor you cannibals!  LOL
I'm actually broke right now and there are no games on sale I want to buy.  I actually don't know what to do right now.
You selected such a gloriously codependent user name. Love it.  Welcome to Reddit. :D
agreed as well.
Hmm....I doubt it. I've only had my age checked once in london...and it was at an internship program event. I'm sure others will know better though.
I keep getting  &gt;Already invited? We've temporarily exceeded our capacity. Please try again soon.
Starcraft also meets on Sunday  check out /r/barcraft for more info. :) 
2 months ish, my bank account details weren't getting sent to my new house and i didnt have internet banking. 
http://www.mediaconverter.org/
Being as your question doesn't really contribute anything to society, I'd say you were guilty of the very thing you're speaking of.  Everybody wants to be respected and appreciated.
I definitely think that a woman who chooses to get raped, rather than raped and beaten-to-within-an-inch-of-her-life, is asking for it.
That doesn't change the fact that the coffee was served at a dangerously high temperature, much higher than anyone else's, so they could save money. 
Brings back some memories of a great championship fight in 2005 &amp; 2006.
he's holding my dick too eveyone   ^ this guy is a dick holder/ 
They had a commercial last week yelling at the nfl about the lockout. The football really doesn't matter the writers are great with anything and they could do fantasy hockey or something and they would all suck. Who knows
I'm not mad, it's just hard to take somebody seriously when they come off as a 6th grader.
[Mary Roach: 10 things you didn't know about orgasm](http://www.ted.com/talks/mary_roach_10_things_you_didn_t_know_about_orgasm.html)
Sorry about the accusation then. But I really don't think thats gonna happen. Mostly because The Dark Angel Saga will be running concurrently with Schism.
Marijuana is the only thing that made my PMSing cramps/moodiness/etc better.. but it did compound the whole "EAT/but it hurts 'cause I'm swollen/but somehow eating is the only thing that soothes me"-thing..  I am not a pothead or a stoner by any means but sometimes when I'm about to start the rag/just started I want to smoke maaaad trees.  Yo.  
People are supposed to downvote posts when they disagree with someone's opinion, didn't you get the memo?   -____-
Also parts of Louisiana, Maine, Vermont, New Hampshire, and Florida, also you missed a couple in Europe ( Albania, Andorra, Bulgaria, Macedonia, Greece, Armenia, Romania and Cyprus )  or anywhere in most of Africa or Southeast Asia.  [Here's a map for reference.](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/File:Map-Francophonie_organisation_2011-fr.png)
Hey, hey, remember I live in Jersey!  Everything I could ever want and need is within a 20 minute drive!  Clusters of malls and stores and retailers, highways with long trajectories dedicated to electronic stores, car dealerships, department stores, etc!  Man, maybe I **should** take a nice LONG trip and get the hell out of the clutter! 
http://i.imgur.com/eJJIV.jpg
They can take issue all they like. I'm not listening any more than the fat BS lady across the street is... you know, the one in a fold-out chair on the sidewalk and her huge ass bottle of 10.1% Molson. Yeah, that's what I meant by unruly. The kind that comes from the more... colourful speaker, if you will.
stand up and look down. works both ways
I don't understand. Can you elaborate? I don't plan on using anything but the 1x reflex sight, so I should be good at ranges at which parallax is not obvious?
http://steamcommunity.com/id/Rincewind2010/wishlist
Niiiiice!  Envious, and glad you didn't sell that baby.
as someone who has come to extremely stupid conclusions that i never understood afterwards while tripping balls... yea. 
just sat down
I'd like to join, please. My username is DeliaEris.
You'd have to play on Slag Pits to notice him.
&gt;You all realize that Facebook owns everything you've ever put on there or ever will right?  I don't really give a shit about that. What prompted me to abandon mine was the constant passive agressive gaming that goes on with it. Who replies to who, if you're added or not, tagging, it's like signing up to be in a teenage slumber party gossip session that never ends. 
Definitely Sasha. I've seen this flick. I remember it. Quite fucking hot. Sorry can't link to it, but if anyone else can I'm ... uh ... ready.
Yeah, did you hear about that Sterling Archer guy on the news? He actually got a false positive on a biopsy, then a false negative, then an actual positive. On top of that, his mother is suing the doctor for sexual harassment. What a clusterfuck.
Ya, I guess since we dont really know the whole story we shouldnt assume anything. The sad part is that I live in northern california about 30min from where this happened, but I dont watch the news so I didnt hear anything. 
Once our server updates and I can fiddle freely, then I think I can figure it all out.
Now that's a paper jam
I wish I wasn't artistically challenged. 
Of course.
Nostalgia orgasm. Loved this growing up. Upboats for you! 
 u jelly
I'd have to disagree with you, I find ultras are a lot more useful.
TL;DR
I apologize for the downvotes, now that I am out your karma is restored!
Well hello. Took ya long enough to get here.
I have fag hags, but I just haven't found that special hag yet. Message me and we'll negotiate the terms of your hag-dom.
TEST is growing up so Maelstroms are the new Drakes.
Ah, fair enough! Northern types are typically more known for showing the skin :)  As a londoner if you ever fall afoul of one of our angry mobs just throw a mirror on the ground and run the other way while they're admiring themselves, never known to fail.
lol, I can see it now. No offense was taken in the first place :)
How does [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/California/comments/icye3/attempt_3_at_a_new_logo_this_time_i_incorporated/) look?
Michael Bay Presents: The Lance Armstrong Story.
Bring 'em on!  The best evidence suggests that the Vogons have already arrived, and our governments were on THEIR side.
Awesome! Just moved to Manassas a few months ago from NY. We are still trying to find new places to go and new things to do :) Just found this subreddit and already is very helpful!
I understand, it's just that, for my part, there is no acting involved.  Or attempts at conversion.  I've been through (and still *have*) too much weird shit in my life to judge somebody based on one single detail.  EDIT: by "weird shit" I mean that if you were to take three guesses at cliche things that happen to kids, I guarantee one has happened to me, and probably two.  EDIT2: In reference to first edit - there was no abuse, thankfully.  Just other cliche crap.
Is that an ironic or hypothetical coast?
My friend and I convinced a pair of 30 year old women to take off their clothes. My friend and I were smoking a joint and listening to mash-up music and apparently cute enough.. *gotta do that more often*
Yeah, and $40 million will go further in Buffalo too.
This AMA is awesome! just went through the whole while suppose to be working, woops so you're probably off work now but if you get bored at home or at work next time, could you draw a dolphin rape cave
oh wow, thank you.
This was when I did drag:  http://a1.sphotos.ak.fbcdn.net/hphotos-ak-snc6/168438_1704312781717_1654936369_1591199_7971575_n.jpg
dude.. you're not supposed to stick your hands in your eyes.  
someone told me I had hideous teeth! so this comment pretty much made my day. thaank you&lt;3
As I have said on numerous occasions and places, I will be proud to wear my Ellis jersey even if he goes to another team. He is a downright classy individual and deserves some starting playing time at his home position.  Also, I have seen him turn some absolutely retardedly good double plays. He and Tulo are going to be a ridiculous pair.
FYI, i read your mind, and quite frankly i'm both disgusted and frightened. 
Project 64 is not malicious software. I think you either messed up and it didn't install or put it in a different place than you thought.
I &lt;3 Cats. 
WEEE OOOH WEEE OOOH.
Pygmy was pretty good in the bathroom...
Very.. narrative story. I guess the reasons (cost) have been covered though. I don't agree.  For one not every moon has been landed on and there is a fuckton of them, and i have no doubt that sending new probes will yield much more information.  I should try figure out how long a Jupiter-orbiter can look at different moons and how many moons it can get a good look at.  Another idea, could something like [IceCube](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/IceCube_Neutrino_Observatory), but with the km^3 s of ice right next to the vacuum of space instead on Earth with atmosphere yield information on cosmic rays? I suspect that the noise from the lower energy cosmic rays is terribly high relative to high end.(And you have to stop the regular light if you don't measure from very deep ice)  Radio measurements on signals from the moon due to high energy neutrinos causing charge to produce breamstahlung are also being proposed. Quite possible that stuff like this on other moons is interesting too.
I sit in a chair with back support.  I've tried sitting through the pain, keeping my focus placed on my breathing, but it's very hard. And I'm not convinced it's what I should be doing.  Would love to hear some suggestions! 
&gt; I've got some very real (diagnosed) social anxiety problems...  Are you being actively treated by a mental health professional?  If not, why not? If so, ask them about:  &gt; Since the weight room in this place is so small (a single squat rack) these guys use the place exclusively to hang out and do nothing but curls. Whenever I've managed to get there before them they immediately gather and stand a foot or two behind me staring and refuse to talk until I get out. It's basically intimidation and the gym can't do anything about it since they're just "waiting".  ...and how you can use it to help combat your anxiety issues.  If Gym A is 2 miles from your house, and convenient for you to use, there is absolutely no reason this can't be another opportunity for overall development.  At some point, you're going to have to actually address your anxiety issues; why not start here?
Grass is amazing for running, really cushions the blow. Head down to the nearest park and do some laps. 
"t3hj35t3r" *is* a [psuedo-hacker](http://pastebin.com/XDXyQ5KQ)....
I cut and pasted from a previous response comment of mine, which did have paragraphs, and that's what happened.  I have no idea why.  ===  fixed.
You can always let him know that this is not actually science. Real science doesn't start with a conclusion then work backwards for evidence and a hypothesis. Real science gathers data and then tries to explain what it might mean. Trying to explain what things mean and then finding data to back it up is horse shit.
I'm a proud new daddy of a Remington 700 SPS in 30.06. Can't wait to dial it in...  Love the setup, man!
I love the comments that were written using a set of terms I developed for solving the problem and later forgot. Completely, poetically inscrutable.
if you're both on the lease then you're both liable to pay for everything throughout the entireity of the lease. some apartment complexes will make an exception and let you out or him out if theres an extenuating circumstance (like, a police report and domestic violence charges. this is how my then GF got out of her lease with her then creeper turned stalker roommate)  simply put, if he's on the lease, he cant leave anymore than you can. you're both responsible for paying rent for each of the months outlined in the lease agreement.   one thing you could try doing, as unethical as it might sound. would be to talk to the apartment managers and tryt o get yourself off the lease. do it without his knowledge and you'd leave him hanging by his balls.  you also try just being honest with them. see if maybe they'll agree to just go ahead and sue him for breach of contract rather than evict you if you cant make rent?  his being on the lease gives you a little more leveridge, though if he doesn't care about his credit or having any small claims judgements against him/cant/wont pay, then that leveridge is kind of meaningless.
All easily destroyable if someone accidentally hits the redstone. 
You are a fucking quizling.  There is plenty of goddamned difference between "we are all sinners" and "your love is a sin." Hell, I wouldn't use the word "sin" because of its stupid fairytale connotations, but I think we've all done things that are *wrong*. I also know that falling in love was not one of the many *wrong* things I've done. If you're too stupid or self centered to grasp that, it's your fucking problem, not mine. The virulently anti-gay message of *mainstream* Christianity is a big part of the reason I have to fear for my safety if I ever forget myself for a moment and do anything someone might interpret as "acting gay" in public.  Supposedly "liberal" Christians have repeatedly refused to speak against virulently hateful anti-gay bigotry. Their silence is just as much to blame as the bigots lack of silence.  Sojourners **refused** to run an ad simply saying "you are welcome." This is the supposed leaders of supposedly liberal Christianity being unwilling to do something so simple as just say "you're welcome." because that might piss off the bigots. They will always side with bigots.
Okay, make that 200 space shuttles.
We make a difference in our local economy buying strawberries at the farmer's market. So, we can cover up the fact we are selling out to the corporate powers. 
the nipples are staring right at me, except her right one, its a little lazy
And your problem with their genius is?
I was on a date at a restaurant where a few of my friends and I are regulars, and when we were seated, I saw a friend of mine at a business dinner a few tables over.  I came over, said hi, thought nothing more of it.  At the end of the meal, my friend comes over and hands me $40.  He said, "David was our waiter, he did a great job, but the guys I'm eating with are British and they paid the bill, so I'm not sure whether they tipped or not.  Can you ask David and give this to him if they screwed him over?"  I said sure  Next time David wanders by, I flag him down and explain.  David says, "Oh, no, he didn't have to do that, that's too nice of him.  I haven't even looked at the check yet, but I'm sure it's fine".  I said, "Okay, well, go look and if you feel like it was unfair, I'll be sitting right here, otherwise, I'll just give my friend back the money"  David goes over, looks at the check, stands there a minute and walks back over to my table.  He quietly says, "Uh, I don't really know how to say this, but....well...the bill was $197....and they rounded up to $200"  I handed him the $40. EDIT: clarify some grammar
Principles aren't a good thing...
You in cville? 
The government should give a basic salary to every citizen, no conditions.   MAJOR EDIT: Okay, I should probably explain this a bit more. Most people already benefit from the government in one way or another, either directly by welfare and unemployment benefits or indirectly by subsidies and tax cuts.   Providing a basic salary would get rid of a huge bureaucratic overhead while at the same time making the rat race a little less intense. People wouldn't have to work as much in jobs that they hate and could give back more to society either by spending more time with their families, doing voluntary work or educating themselves in areas we right now don't value because there's no money in it. Earning more money would become what it should be, a way to make your life better, not a need to survive.
I SUPPORT ENDING IT  -a bunch of people in this thread that have a combination of race, social class and educational opportunity that they know it won't effect them ever. 
[Family of the Year - Let's Go Down to The River](http://youtu.be/Yao3uJXImJ0)
guys taco bell has zero affect on my BM at this point. did i adapt to regular TB consumption, or is it really just a myth that TB brings about the wrath of Rectus (god of pootin')?
Augh, the kerning!
You could always pretend to kill her new guy.
Was he attractive? Under different circumstances (no language barrier), would you have let him continue?
&gt;voting for different ones leads to different outcomes. and which one do I vote for if I don't want ecological destruction and 90% of wealth being in the hands of 1% of the population? Who do I vote for if I don't want monsanto, exxon, and the christian church making decisions for us? [Reality.](http://1.bp.blogspot.com/-iAptLzbOjkI/Tf9S3PRPXCI/AAAAAAAAC8I/qtt9NInLn58/s1600/i-want-you-to-disagree-and-fight-amongst-each-other.jpg)
Yeah, I guess only time will tell hey? The fact that it will require GetUp or similar to bring some kind of intelligence to our government still saddens me.  So many of the things they do just make you look and wonder who in the fuck thought it was a good idea and how the rest allowed it to happen.  As a smaller but more recent example, I'm not usually one to take a personal interest in animal welfare (thats not to say I don't care, I love animals) but I was on board for the banning of live export when GetUp challenged them over it recently. The fact that the conditions were so primitive and unnecessarily brutal was bad enough but the fact that we had people inspect the facility and give it the ok... and it was still allowed to happen... the only word I can think of to describe it is despicable.   I eat meat, no doubt and I think it is genuinely a necessity for society but eye gouging, breaking their tail and aimlessly kicking the shit out of them before slitting their throat.... what the fuck.  Back to the main topic here lol, child porn is wrong on so many levels but as you said, if they were confident in their filter then why not say "hey guys, this is whats blocked" and why?  I can't shake the feeling that its purely an excuse to implement the filter while simultaneously saying "look everyone, we're doing something responsible. Time to turn your attention to other things".
he was saying thanks to your future post
Most fish pics I see the fish is between a few inches and around a foot from the chest. I don't think the size is distorted very much from that kind of difference in distance. 
No pictures of me.  Just imagine Myself, my blacked out (but awake) girlfriend (at the time), best friend and his family, completely trashed, trash around us from the feast we ate.  Accompanied with Myself and my friend screaming our lungs out in celebration, followed by shots... Many many shots of conjac.  Oh and a lonely Steelers fan that thought it was a good idea to come to a Green Bay dominant household thinking Pittsburgh was actually going to win.  lulz
Somehow I talked my parents into buying me a TI-92 when I was in 8th grade. It had just come out. Still have it.   I remember trying to first figure out the solve function. I was like what the hell does too few arguments (or whatever it said) mean? Yes, didn't at the time realize you had to enter ,x where x is the variable you want to solve for. 
I am a court reporter and a proofreader.   Words are my LIFE, and the bad grammer used by most people often makes my life difficult.  I really love you guys for having this delightful conversation!  Thank you : )
Depends on where. Italy, definitely not uptight. Germany, pretty uptight if you aren't in the south.
Get them both when very young, or make sure that they're okay with the other species when adopting (If you're going to a puppy/kitten mill, then ignore this advice, and bark and meow at the cat and dog to make them love each other, preferably while in between them, while covered in both cat and dog food)  Otherwise it's a experiment in futility.
My friends will probably not want to play anymore if that happens LOL! I'm going to add them.
yeah I was really reluctant to getting an i5, but after reading a bunch of reviews, it seems it performs just as well as the i7 for gaming for the most part. thx for the suggestion! any other thoughts?
That... is actually kind of hilarious
Isn't Summer Heights High kiwi?
You misunderstand all three of those arguments.  For instance, this:  &gt;at best convinces people of a deistic god  Patently untrue, Aquinas' arguments demonstrate the existence of a God which is at all times sustaining and in intimate communion with all creation.  &gt;Whatever is "outside" space and time that began all of space in time is only a "god" insofar as it began the universe. You can't make any further assumptions about what it is.  Is not the case according to Aquinas, in the Five Ways alone he derives quite a bit more about God. &gt;And that's assuming the universe has a beginning.   Aquinas' Cosmological argument does not predicate that the universe had a temporal beginning, it is fully compatible with an eternally extant universe.  &gt;And that's assuming you can convince the other person of the presupposition that "everything that begins to exist must have a cause".  Can you point to something that didn't? &gt;is simply an argument from ignorance. "We don't know how something as complex as this universe could have come to exist without something guiding it, therefore God did it". "  That is absolutely and 100% not in any way Aquinas' teleological argument.  That seems like a caricature of Paley's teleological argument which is fundamentally incompatible with Thomistic metaphysics.  This is Aquinas' Fifth Way:  &gt;The fifth way is taken from the governance of the world. We see that things which lack intelligence, such as natural bodies, act for an end, and this is evident from their acting always, or nearly always, in the same way, so as to obtain the best result. Hence it is plain that not fortuitously, but designedly, do they achieve their end. Now whatever lacks intelligence cannot move towards an end, unless it be directed by some being endowed with knowledge and intelligence; as the arrow is shot to its mark by the archer. Therefore some intelligent being exists by whom all natural things are directed to their end; and this being we call God.  do you see how it's not what you describe?  The Ontological Argument and Aquinas' Five Ways are some of the most misunderstood arguments I've ever encountered.  There really is a lot more there than what commonly bandied about strawman versions would have you believe.  
Great point man. What do you classify things like sins as? An idea?
It's like RAAAAYYYYYEEEAAAAAAAAAAAIIIIIIIIIIINNNNNNN
"I have to admit something... I have AIDS..."  "No problem, I went to the internet yesterday! Let's fuck!"
That's the whole point of 6 though, it's not really about the central story so much as it is the stories of the different characters. It easily has the most memorable, complex characters in the franchise and even in the history of gaming. 
[r/BottleCaps](http://www.reddit.com/r/BottleCaps) 
I got mine out a few years back. The main thing I remember immediately following the experience is being really woozy from the anesthesia. I felt like I could kinda function, but I was pretty wrong. Parents driving me home, decided to stop for jamba juice or something b/c they thought it might be good (and it was) but upon getting home I knocked it over b/c I just didn't have the hand/eye coordination to pick it up off of the kitchen table. So ya, watch out for stuff like that, it can be annoying when you first get home. Anyway, after that I think i went to take a nap and when I woke up it was all good.  The most important thing I can say is to make sure you are on top of keeping the sockets clean until they heal. It is quite important, and you wouldn't want to end up needing to have more crap done to your mouth b/c you didn't take proper care.  Honestly the pain wasn't bad at all, and I think a lot of people (maybe those with a super low threshold) over hype it. They gave me a big bottle of painkillers after the surgery, but I never felt the need for one (although tbh I'd much rather deal with a little pain than take pills for it, I'm much more afraid of the painkillers).
Draw an evil cat, laughing at a flower..... but then they makeup.... and then THEY FIGHT!!!!!!!!
*Doo-bee-doo-bee-doo-bee*
[Handbrake](http://handbrake.fr/) should work nicely for you...  Though you fail to mention formats/file types.
&gt; Comment your code  Specifically, ALL your code. You cannot know what part someone will be confused by, however obvious you think it is, so document everything.
Most important thing. Tell him he must keep his cool, must not over react. If they ratchet up the noise, he must dial his down a comparable amount., if he matches their noise, they'll go higher, thinking that's the way to "win". Tell him to continue to be his sweet self, just as nice a son as always. Best to you and to him.
No, just asked how long she'd be alone for each day, if I had any other pets, etc..
Crisis Core, to me at least, was the strongest out of the Final Fantasy spinoffs. I played Dirge and thought it was what it was intended to be, a dirty cash grab. It's a slow paced game, that wanted to be RE4 mixed with FF. I enjoyed the few nods here and there, but the bulk of the game was just forgettable. 
where's your fanbois QQing about no LAN support now?
Biwako, on Main St just south of the stadium.  There's also one down in Saline if you're up for a drive.
He has photographs of himself and another soldier doing guard duty in those uniforms.  I wouldn't have mentioned it unless I actually saw it.
How much can the Situation lift (Squats, benchpress etc.). Even though his arms are big he looks weak
We have second hand evidence that supports the conclusion that there was something that pushed apart the stars to explain the Doppler shift. That's about as solid as any evidence for anything being explained by gods.
There's so many stupid people in the world, I just assumed you were another one... which it seems you are.
just that
Awesome, thanks!  After I heard about MegaShark vs. Giant Octopus, I went out and bought every other Octopus-themed thriller I could find on Amazon. MegaShark vs. Giant Octopus is tops in my book, but Octopus 2: River of Fear is also very fun...an Octopus terrorizes the Hudson River!  Eye of the Beast stars James Van Der Beek, but the pace is a little too slow for my taste.
And a huge coat. It's damn cold.  Welcome to the Jungle......
good advice and something I have not yet considered. i read about that stupid thing about how the face tattoo in the hangover two was a big issue. 
I did a mock jury and they took my time piece from me....ugh...worst 10 hours of my life without my phone....
I second what fuzzyhatmonster said!
I don't understand why people hate Gamestop, though. They're just trying to make money. If you don't like their insurance crap or whatever, don't buy it. They've never failed to provide me my games, and they haven't harassed me either.
Thank you for your answer.  You know, it's pretty funny but, having read your entire story in one sitting at work (and not taking my eyes off the screen for even one second, not even to blink), i felt like you were the heroine of a book, or movie. Like those movie stars. And, you replying to me feels, for some reason, like i just got a reply from Frodo, or Batman, or something. Awesome =)  Again, you are an amazing person, never change.
Now *that's* an item duplication bug if I ever saw one..
Indeed.  Colin Powell as well advocated for DADT as chairman of the joint chiefs.  Both he and Clinton have since stated they regretted ever supporting it.
Clueless
Not to be mean but you did kind of go asking for it to an extent.  That being said, no matter what you look like someone will complain about something typically (too thin, too fat, little extra weight etc.)  You lost a lot of weight and you should be proud of yourself girl!  Think of all the cute clothes you can wear that you once couldn't (as a fatty I cannot wait to be smaller again for those clothes).
not if you are grade school...
http://images.lowes.com/product/converted/049206/049206181168xl.jpg  pull with raky side.... flip...push ...smooth dirt  you can also push raky side if u want
I always feel kinda bad for these girls who are just minding their own business and get their pictures passed around by internet pervs.  I mean, she was just some random high school girl in track who a local newspaper took a picture of. It's not like she posted nude pics on the internet or something.
stem height and seatpost height are easy to adjust (although  curse you threadless systems).  the geometry difference that matter are going to be things like headtube angle and chainstay length which will affect handling.  You could easily get the same position on both bikes.
Actually, Arachna is a Viper port.
I think Loveless changed how I looked at music more than any other work I've ever heard.  It made me analyze why I like certain types of music, and in many cases I listened to music just because it was familiar.  After this I began actively listening to music that I wouldn't normally listen to, and in many cases the beauty began to become apparent after I really understood the album.
I actually agree with you for the most part that these type of comics have no place here. I guess I just got all sentimental thinking about my little sibling. 
"I bring you love." "It's bringing love!  Don't let it get away!"
Use less water, or maybe you just got a crappy one. Also, try angling it one way or another, if the shape of it looks like that makes sense. 
Thank you for including the Beach Boys. So many happy songs and memories are associated with them for me.
True. Set cost will also drop with each season.  And other than maybe Dinklage I don't see anyone rivaling Beans paycheck. Though total increase across multiple actors will likely do so. And hopefully as the show continues its budget will grow.  I still agree it will hover around 12 episodes per season though. 
I was thinking the same thing: "Hey, I can make Leaf Windows now!"
I am me, who are you to judge what I do?   But in all reality you can try and whiteknight this all you want, but that doesn't change awful music. 
Lots of heroin junkies and muggers and rapists hanging out in your gym?
You're missing the point. I think we Americans miss having the old Ruskies to compete with. They were a damn worthy adversary--(me channeling Buck Turgeson). 
Relevant: http://en.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/hwfzh/my_teacher_told_me_that_i_may_just_have_created/c1yyqp3?context=5
[Backpack](http://www.tf2items.com/id/Barbarossa6)  This is how I do mine, getting more problematic as more weapons get released, and I need to sort hats better.
...and then i had enough money to buy this. BADABOOM!
You want me to look at your cake. The only thing i see is the "Energizer" charger.
If it had anything to do with Grammar, maybe.
It tastes awful
Pretty good, so far. I like to eat, shoot, and leave.
Nailed it!
I'm not interested in debates about "morality" or in chastising people for their dietary habits. I was just commenting on the absurdity of claiming that slaughtering animals can be anything but cruel.
I'm pretty settled on Maxine
I hate that show so much.
Wait...someone happened to post this on the *exact* right day of the year...it's...it's too beautiful to have happened by chance...
What kind of organisation are you interviewing with?  If it's a large company with an HR department, or a smaller company whose main business is in a different sector, you're more likely to be interviewed by somebody who doesn't code.  You'll want to emphasise any experience you have in terms of things you have achieved, places you have worked, qualifications you've earned, etc.  If it's a small design agency or similar, you're more likely to be interviewed by a developer who is interested in seeing code samples and finding out how well you understand the various languages you'll be working with.  If you don't have any sample code you can show them, think of a simple thing you can build, build it, and show them that.
Or show us you exist so that religion gets dumped and we start to work together as a planet and a species instead of little groups of races, parties, and faiths.
And there's supposed to be a difference between "enhanced interrogation" and "torture" besides that "enhanced interrogation" is just a euphemism, right?
I thought that was a prerequisite to play magic in the first place?
I don't think anybody's arguing that circles are new.  Facebooks lists feel tacked on and clunky, because they are. Circles are the same idea done better. 
I can not see how this comment makes any sense what so ever, you link to irrelevant conversations from the past, strange billboards, a picture of a dog and a google images search of neckties..  its all like some strange absurdist skit.   Underlying it all seems to be some indication that there is some overarching conspiracy.   Would you care to explain, as simply as you can, exactly what it is you are trying to say?  
Those guards, called "tsoliades" (tsolias in the singular) are very similar to the Grenadier Guards that stand in front of Buckingham Palace. They are only allowed limited movement a few times a day and usually rotate in shifts of about 4 hours (correct me if I'm wrong, fellow Hellenes). So yes, there is mayhem and tear gas going on all around them and they cannot flinch or move until their shift is over. It's considered one of the most honorable posts in the Greek military and only select men are chosen to be part of this group of guards.
Hydrogen storage is a nightmare. It's a better idea to use the wind turbines to run the hydro turbines "backwards"- i.e., pump water against the gravitational potential back into the upper reservoir, and store energy that way.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=U7mPqycQ0tQ
3/10  You're troll-fu is many weak
I'd heard of these emulators but I thought they all got removed from the market or were full of spyware or something?  Will definitely check it out though if they're safe to do so.
Do you really think John Fleming will ever read that? It was read by some aid and the response to you was crafted by a team of hacks. I've rarely seen responses that seemed real. 
[These classy fellows.](http://flightoftheconchords.co.nz/wp-content/themes/fotc/images/editorial/vintage-540x432.jpg)
These are pretty old, but whatevs. [I sure do love Blue Moon!](http://i.imgur.com/Sbkbj.jpg) [I sure do love giant lollipops!](http://i.imgur.com/9fQkn.jpg)
Spotlight search is quick too. And why not Favourites?
Have you seen the video of them ballroom dancing during that campaign stop and she stops while he keeps going by himself in the background?  Or the one where he's talking to some guy and he does an impromptu jump squeal?  Or the jazz hands walking down the hallway?  As a straight man I wouldn't be so quick to call this out if he weren't all "gays are barbarians".  On a normal day I wouldn't give a shit.
I'll post comments whenever I please, thanks.
If you're looking to build a wardobe on a budget I recommend the following two blogs:  http://anaffordablewardrobe.blogspot.com/ http://dappered.com/  Particularly Dappered. 
Zoning laws are generally stupid and arbitrary.  So someone buys land for agriculture and builds a building on it...HOLY SHIT CALL THE POLICE.  There are tons of building on land used for farming, what's the big deal.  Many farmers live on their land which they also work.  America might have its issues, but at least you can build a house where you want to.  
oh cool thx for shaing! ^_^
I have never laughed so hard in my life
Better question, why would you think you were wrong? 
Did anybody see that?  That guy just flew away.
I would be most pleased if you could turn [this](http://i.imgur.com/5iJ2g.jpg) into a beautiful work of your art!
nah I was born in 1991 and we have much better weed today, though I wish I had some connections to some psychedelics.
&gt; I had a revelation in middle school when my friend told me that he listened to both rap AND rock music. I didn't even know you could do that. Seriously. I thought I was stuck listening to all this music I hate on the radio for the rest of my life because black people weren't supposed to listen to rock music.  LOL! The exact opposite for me. White guy here and I spent my middle school years listening to rock music (still true actually). I thought white people listened to rock and black people listened to rap and that was how it was. But then I was reading an article about a video game, something about Def Jam, and it had a timeline for that record company. And on it it mentioned that American Records broke off of Def Jam and I just had a wtf moment. System of a Down was produced by the same guy that discovered LL Cool J?! In the late 80's Slayer released albums with the Def Jam label? That's when I learned all music was connected. Now I listen to all different kinds of shit including hip-hop; been history ever since.
What the fuck... how stupid is this lady?  The single fact that the meeting was supposed to be late at night should have set off a dozen warning bells   Though it is probably good you were there at least she wasn't shot.
I-75 is the worst interstate in history.  
HA. These are amazing.  I totally want one.
As long as /r/guitar, /r/metal, /r/skateboarding, and FSM only knows who the hell else all think that they're "shreddit", we will never know.
A bunch of CoD fanatics in a single building at the same time?  This could be arson.
It seems that they are talking about the same thing from 2 perspectives in your quotes: In the first one their statistical analysis including these factors did not change the overall outcome.   The second one, from the discussion section, is more of a cautionary note: Their data simply doesn't allow a clear enough statistical conclusion determining the associations of saturated fat with stroke or CHD in these subgroups.  They didn't see an association, but that might be due to insufficient data.  Another quote: &gt; Furthermore, despite several indications in the published literature that sex and age may modify the association of saturated fat with CHD (5, 6, 8, 10), we did not observe effects of these variables on CHD risk. The lack of an association may have been related to **limited statistical power**.
fad fonts are gross
well, to me, 'hard to hit' means 'it's hard to click on them because they're too small/fast' o.O  also, there's not as much need to split the bio, because you can easily snipe the ultras (to greatly soften them), meaning they should die before getting to the bio or VERY soon thereafter
It and the MP5 are the best SMG's. There are other completely usable SMG's, but none are as easy to use or versatile as those two.
[](/b05"No, dummy. That's clearly a Midnight Sparkle emoticon.")
Both my parents got PhD's in the same field, went on to get married, raise a family and both work full time. Out of the two, my mom has had the more successful career. There have been ups and downs (that's life) but my mom is not only an amazing example of a career woman, but a fantastic mother and person. Having such an amazing role model has made me strive for the best in myself, and so far it's working out pretty well :) Hang in there!
Here's one:  [We Love Dancing - by Arling &amp; Cameron](http://new.music.yahoo.com/arling-cameron/videos/view/we-love-dancing--2150543)
HIPSTER
I'm sorry, at the beginning of the story you said she shorted you 7 dollars. Did you not count the money before you left, I mean can't you knock on the door and say like, "where's the rest?". I'm not a delivery driver maybe that's against protocol, in which case fuck protocol.
I had the Mirena.  My periods before that were very painful and heavy, so I was recommended the Mirena.  It was also way way cheaper ($80 plus $10 for meds.)
hopefully this hits daily deals. I've had my eye on it for a while.
The physical differences of the brain that are commonly associated with sex have weak correlations, both among cisgendered and transgendered people.  The studies that I've read about physical differences in the brain between men and women (and transmen and transwomen) do show a tendency for transpeople to have brain characteristics of cispeople of the same gender (e.g. transwomen will tend to be in the same range as ciswomen) however, there is overlap between the "female" and "male" areas of scale.  And even with the very limited number of subjects that have been in these studies, there were transpeople whose brain make-up fell well into the area of their birth sex, and not their gender.  **TL;DR:** Gender and "brain sex" are not the same thing, don't correlate perfectly.  EDIT:  [Found the study I was referring to](http://jcem.endojournals.org/content/85/5/2034/F1.expansion.html).  I guess it specifically deals with transwomen and not transmen.
*\*waves*\*
*(Read this post in the gayest Perez Hilton voice you can manage!)*  Are **you** down to **fuck**, bro?
That's an amazing deal. Six per case?
wow
Frequently, due to massive overuse of TLAs and ETLAs in today's society... 
You can hide whether the people in your circles are visible to the world.
I'm glad the internet provides me the avenue to tell others how fucking stupid this is.
Yup, engaged and then grounded.  She was 19 at the time.  And sadly she is even more wrapped up in her head now than she was then.  She's a very selfish person, which is why I really don't like to associate with her much anymore.
*Vulpyne* uses **wall of text** attack. It's *super effective*!  Ok, let me try get this out properly. &gt; However, adding personal agendas to a topic where none are required is equally offensive and pisses me off, as it distorts the clarity of the message. *I don't really understand this. We both posted our opinions. Is something different when I post mine compared to when you post yours?*  Yes, I posted an opinion based on the video, which contained her agenda (you can choose what that is for the sake of brevity.) You posted an opinion based on my comment, which added a moral angle which was not present in her agenda, thus inserting your own (being that killing for food is wrong.) I may be splitting hairs here, but I felt you took the original message and molded it unnecessarily to fit your worldview.  &gt; Your arguments about chickens and carrots DO NOT stand, as they are not equal comparisons in the light you cast. Her comparison equalizes the two and does not attribute characteristics to them (like vertebrate vs. invertebrate) in order to make her point. *Perhaps I'm misinterpreting her (although neither of us have access to her true meaning). I would be interested in knowing what you think she meant by that.*  I think she is breaking it down to the atomic level. Everything that *is* is nothing more than a collection of energy. When we consume, we transfer that energy as food into our body, regardless of the physical manifestation of said energy. In that sense, there is little difference in the energy value of what is consumed. I think she is being more ethereal rather than scientific, so biological differences don't apply.  I'll try to respond to your other comments in a bit...
[Yeah, haven't you heard about this yet?](http://www.youtube.com)
I agree. I think it's going to be a great game, but thinking it's going to revolutionize FPS games is a bit much. I think people just associate id games with changing the way we play games. They did, after all, make Wolfenstein 3D.   Plus, you never know. The combination of all those elements you mentioned may just make a game that *could* change the playing field. It all comes down to the execution. 
Anything I can possibly misconstrue as approval is welcome.
And yet, if you had pulled out a gun and shot him, you'd probably be in trouble.
I see christians' "relationship" with their god the same way I see a battered wife in an abusive relationship. They may claim to love their god, but they're always walking on eggshells around their god, afraid that if they do something wrong they'll feel its wrath and end up in hell. And they don't want anyone else to get their god mad either, lest it turns its wrath upon them as well.   It's sad, really.
RIP. His music just gets me where I need to be when I am not at a 100% he was a magnificent musician
Isn't that what I just said?
I know a guy, who knows a guy, who once met a guy who was cousin with a guy who ate an anaconda.  We all enjoy eating anaconda. I think you see my point with that statement. At some point those connections are meaningless, and the data is unreliable.  Data can be pretty worthless outside of its original context. Or as I was taught in statistics class [correlation does not imply causation](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Correlation_does_not_imply_causation).  
i dont think i'm nerdy enough to get this! also-- way more badass tattoo then mine. haha
You didn't clean it up did you!?
Control F... yep there it is.  Good man.
What does it say???
me too, I can't send out invites either.. looks like Google Plus has already failed.. 
&gt; I know Reddit is kinda sympathetic towards Islam and Muslims, but you really should sit down and read through what you are defending.  Okay, now I'm confused? Around here I've seen plenty defending of religious freedom (and liberties in general) of Muslims, in the context of their existence in America and Europe. And plenty defending of Arabs and Persians in general (rather than Muslims specifically), in the context of America and Europe (also Israel) kicking the crap out of them. The impression I get is that out with that, Islam's just a pile of "meh" to most folk here. Well, besides the /r/atheism, but let's not go there.
There is a huge discrepancy in how much certain teams are able/willing to pay. But, yeah I agree that a lot of owners sign ridiculous contracts
I can understand MvC3, not 2, though xD
If you're using Windows 7, I think you can navigate to "appdata" by goign to Start and typing in "%appdata%" without quotes. open ".minecraft" right click on "bin", click properties, and click "previous versions". There should hopefully be a previous version in there, which would be 1.6.6. Good luck! :D
forgot to say this... good luck. guy sounds like a genuine POS. the sooner he's out of your life, the better.
ROFL, I think I'd be fine with it backed up on some sort of harddrive, I'm pretty sure we just rot into the ground when we die. Kinda not banking on the whole heaven/hell thing.
in the process of reading them :)
From [here](http://picasa.google.com/support/bin/answer.py?answer=1299273):  &gt; To encourage the natural flow of conversation, once you sign up for Google+, &gt; all albums can be reshared by people that have access to the album -- &gt; those people on the album's 'Shared with' list in Picasa Web Albums  I don't want people resharing my photos - so that's a deal-breaker for Google+ for me.
Defiantly?  I'm not sure I'd even go for "aggressively".  But you should definitely talk to them.
It's really not that bad even without a modular PSU: http://imgur.com/a/zJ3vq#yvSF8
Yeah, no it's not, it's from his 'Pope song'.
My experience was very easy. I remember going in to the doctor's room, and sitting in the chair. After a quick explanation of what was going to happen, they asked if I was ready to get the IV inserted. Needle went in, and the nurse told me "You're probably going to see the ceiling do some funny things, just keep your head back and relax." After about 6 seconds of nothing, I decided to see what the ceiling was doing and looked up. It went from being a normal flat ceiling to a morphing whirling wall of AWESOME. Then as soon as I went to say "Yeah, it's working" I was in the recovery room laughing my head off. Apparently when the teeth were extracted, I asked the nurse if she thought my mom would like to keep them "because she always liked that stuff when I was younger."  Recovery took a few days for the swelling to subside a bit, and by the end of the week I was mostly back to normal. During that time, I built an insane fortress in Minecraft, because on the painkillers EVERYTHING was amazing.  tl;dr advice: Don't pick at the sockets, don't smoke, don't force yourself to do anything besides recover. Make sure to follow cleaning instructions that the doctor has. You'll probably be eating nothing but soft foods/liquids for a while, but it's not that bad. Just... try not to smoke or suck anything through a straw. That makes things bad.
Interesting video. Thanks.
brah your probably lookin real pasty right now, over weight and what not. Do you raelly think any Night Elf or Tuaren female would everhit that? Ask yourself "would I hate that? hit it so hard I popped out lil Horde babies?" Do da right thing, get swole, pull hoez
Why 27fps?
Hope you read this, could you go more in the direction of exaggerating their actual expressions? Some of them look a little off, to be honest. But they're great nonetheless!
No, it just makes you as bad as the corrupt cops are.
pretty sure once someone mentioned auto toilets, argumeernt is ov
because she is hot and i think its hot to fuck women who have bf's or husbands.  i get turned on my slutty hot women.  i do it alot.
I don't see why not?
Creo que ya te entendí. ¿Te parece sesacionalista? A mi no se me lo hace tanto, al final son fotos de Tijuana en 3D, para mí es interesante verlas de ese modo, pero puedo entender como conjugan dos cosas que atraen a la gente para vender más diarios.
&gt;  People are not supposed to be omnibenevolent and omnipotent. God is.  I agree people are physically incapable of being omnipotent or omnibenevolent. But there's a huge gap between doing nothing and doing everything.  Besides, 1% our income is a far cry from being omnipotent or omnibenevolent.  Does it mean: * It'll inconvenience us? * Force us to make an effort? * Take sacrifice on our part?  Yes but if you truly believe people are worth it, you'll take the time and energy to do it.  And have you considered that God decided to demonstrate His omnipotence and omnibenevolence through other people?  &gt; If God used something like 0.0001% of his infinite power (less than that), then all tragedy on Earth would cease.  There's a couple of points here:  1. If you have an issue with His method, I can certainly sympathize because I wish God would flex and just make things happen too. But you and I are not in a position to be able to see everything He does. There's things happening that we cannot see or understand.  2. What you call tragedy may not necessarily be all bad. Would you be the person you are without the hardships in your life? It's sad but hardship makes us better people. It refines our character.  In other cases, God says that He purposely takes the righteous away because they don't deserve to go through the punishment He's about to unleash on the wicked.
This time... it's real.
Pretty well nailed it, except for the grunting courts...thats only in tennis, not racquetball. 
I don't think that's so bad :) At least you're making the female redditors feel better about guys! Yay!
One year is waaaay less than an SSD should last, even under heavy use. OCZ has a 2-3 year warranty on their SSD's, see if you can get it RMA'd: http://www.ocztechnology.com/support/warranty/  As for the data on the drive, you can image the SSD to any other HDD with disk cloning software like [Ghost](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ghost_%28software%29).
He's the new Bengals quarterback
Hotdamn! Wow,  you look amazing!
Evidence that the TSA is an illusion of security. Evidence.
Now? I'm not even sure if they still have interns. The requirements for InBev at the time required you speak two languages and a bunch of other crazy stuff.  At the time they had interns for all the departments at each of the breweries for the most part. There were * 3 in Engineering * 2 in Environment Health &amp; Safety * 2 in Quality Assurance/Testing * 1 in Administrative (Accounting) * 4 (I think) in Packaging * 2/3 in Brewing  I believe those numbers were similar at other breweries as well. 
I'll typically side with most people in the serving industry.  For waiters, their tip is their only real source of income.  Usually their regular paycheck rates only cover the taxes that need to be taken out.  And even then, they usually have to pay extra if they made more than was taken out.  But in this instance, while I wouldn't leave a regular good tip, I may have given her an insult tip (which I've only done RARELY; When the service was beyond bad).  Maybe 2 or 3 dollars.  Just because of her attitude the previous time you had seen her.  She hurt your paycheck, I don't understand why she's angry that you hurt hers.  
err...okay? what are you getting at?
True. How many blockbuster movies have used comic sans as the title typeface? Avatar truly signalled a new era for Papyrus.
I don't know how it came about that she got those seats but she's been going - and had her season ticket - long before Alex Ferguson got there. Really, he sits near her.  It's a tragedy in our family really ;-)
It's all right. We'll get our revenge when the babyboomers have to sell up and enter into care.   I suggest buying shares in resthome companies and petfood suppliers now.
Mom, can you please invest a few hundred thousand dollars for my game?
Why don't public stalls have doors that go lower to the ground? And why is it not standard to have a door-crack blocker on stall doors? These are the great mysteries of our time.
i had the same exact thing happen to me when i was right out of highschool.  she would just get so fucking pissed if i had a chance to do something she wanted to do, and she wasn't there. generally pissed that i would even ask if she was ok with it(and fuck, i took the effort to even ask. i could have just said nothing)  never encountered it again. seems to be a stupid little quirk of immaturity..
It's taking her some getting used to, but she loves that I brought her home some chicken livers to feed her inner predator. 
You say that as if it's a good thing. I disagree, I think the only thing you should force on your children is things that keep them out of harm's way.  Of course, that is what religious parents probably think they're doing when they are imprinting their little ones -- the ruthless efficiency of the religious meme.
First thing that jumped out at me as well!  
One man, who happens to be the director of the Reserve Bank and should be pretty cluey about this sort of thing.  I work in IT sales, and the general consensus across the industry is to buckle your belts up a notch and load the larder with tinned food because Q1 was a massive struggle and Q2 hasn't been great.   If the trend continues (and our customer base is mainly retail and T&amp;L, so our performance more or less mirrors what is going on in those industries) then it's going to be a rough ride for the next 12 months, and then god alone knows what's going to happen.  Not to be all doom and gloom, because in an international sense, the Aussie economy is pretty solid... as long as the resource boom holds.
This is *fucking* amazing. 
Yeah you think they would have thought of how to stop in the beginning...
We're going to need pictures to give good advice here.
Gee, that's a good question. I've been dying to use this routine on someone, and the opportunity has never arisen, so I don't quite know how a girl would react. I would deliver that last line with a smirk and presume that she will not have a comeback. I wouldn't try to follow it with anything, just continue treating her like a brat, using the usual cocky/funny. This IHAB Destroyer is pretty damn cocky. Well, at least Sinn field tested it, I presume he wouldn't teach it unless it stopped a woman dead in her tracks.
As an adult $200 is a lot of money to me, however it is as if best friend is acting like he's better than boyfriend. Best friend stole too. And I don't think it's any different to steal from best buy than your friends. Again, I think since boyfriend and best friend both used drugs and both stole it's interesting to me that best friend is judging and holding a resentment towards boyfriend for doing the same things he did. And if best friend is so bothered by boyfriends theft, why is he okay (and still friends) with people who, according to girl friend have done way worse than boyfriend? Because best friends friends didn't do those far worse things to him personally? Or b/c best friend is just being an asshole?
Torrente wisdom!
Maybe they could be Made in China, and shipped over here ready to go.
Temp agencies, bro. You'll probably have to work manufacturing for a while before you can get a lab job. Manufacturing has a huge turnover, so there's usually something open.  *This all assumes you're in biotech (based on my experience)
While this does sound to me like OP is trying to get free food and/or alcohol, asking for these things is not whoring oneself out.
Wow... that's a pretty good cover. Props to the singer.   I only attempt this song in the shower.
I beg to differ. Letting someone get so close then destroying their heart like that for no reason is pretty bitchy imo. You sound like you've been on the giving end of this situation.
Mutual respect.  If you have it for yourselves, each other, your relationship, and your individual lives, then you have a solid foundation on which to build any relationship.  You may not be able to be romantically involved at the moment, but you could always be good friends (in the true sense of the word) and support each other.  Unconditional love isn't a romance-only thing.  My best friend and I love each other.  There hasn't been a romantic element to our relationship but we are close none-the-less.  Part of the reason I don't try to move things along is because I don't want such a relationship to distract her from doing the things she would do well to experience as part of growing up (she's 21, has taken the MCAT and is looking to get in to med-school).  Would I like to be in a more exclusive relationship with her?  Sure.  But I respect her and her life enough to let things play out naturally.  She's not going anywhere and I'm not going anywhere.  Regardless of what happens, we'll still be friends because that's the foundation we've built.  I guess what I'm saying is, you can still care about someone even if you can't be with them but you don't have to put your life on hold.  If you're content to wait, so be it.  If you can't, so be it.  But you are the one that has to make the call and take appropriate action.
Meh... no one's really that christ-like, it's against most people's nature or human nature in general. Not that it isn't a good thing to be christ-like. It's just really hard for anyone regardless of their spiritual beliefs.
You're saying you don't understand the difference between these two statements?  * I do not believe god exists.  * I believe god does not exist.   The first one is not a claim or an assertion at all. It is merely the lack of a belief. The second one, however, is an assertion, and it is an assertion every bit as unprovable as the assertion that there is in fact a god (due to the fact that you can't prove a negative).   Most atheists who have done a fair bit of thinking about the subject are not totally gnostic in their atheism. Even people like Richard Dawkins maintain at least a sliver of agnosticism about their beliefs, even while acknowledging that the possibility of the existence of a deity is incredibly small.   Read:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Spectrum_of_theistic_probability
I disagree, and my opinion is slightly more important than yours.
I apologize for the trolling, but your argument is that this isn't the worst thing that can possibly happen to someone, and therefore everyone is sensationalizing this. Is that not an extremely silly/tactless thing to say?
My mother thinks Vegetarian means I'll eat meat if she tries hard enough. She makes bacon sandwiches and puts them in front of me. Do you have any idea how hard that is mother? :(
I love that movie. I am sad that a sequel is doubtful now.
well said holly pet
1-Mention of a girl  2-gets upvoted to first page  3- ???  4- Profit.
I was being sarcastic...
The difference with cache sizes isn't easily noticeable. A larger cache will help the *very* large drives, but not to the point that it's worth spending much extra money over.  The performance gains between a 2TB Caviar Green (32MB cache) and a 2TB RE4 (64MB cache, as well as dual processors) is ~20-30%, but the RE4 isn't just a direct cache size upgrade. [Here](http://www.pcper.com/reviews/Storage/Western-Digital-RE4-GP-2TB-Review-Big-Green-Gets-Meaner) is the source.
There are still some words Korean words that have virtually the same pronunciation as their Chinese "hanja" counter parts.  문 = 門 = "Mun" 왕 = 王 = "Wang" 이 = 二 = "Ee"
That song makes me nostalgia so hard...
As long as they can work a way on how to import your Facebook friends, I'm totally down with this. I know you can export friends to CSV, but that's way too hard for the mainstream user to figure out.   It's really the deal breaker, because many people will rely on having a quick and easy way to switch over from Google+ to Facebook to be fully dedicated to the site. 
I'm sorry to be a dick, but this is a repost.
Indeed. I mentioned them further down in this thread, but [Cherrywine - Bright Black](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uVondCfCoJA) was one of my top albums from last decade. I think a lot of people either slept on it or thought it was wack because they didn't sound like Digable Planets.
Nothing in this article asserted that nicotine was harder to quit than heroin, it said it was more addictive. That is based on the percentage of people that use once that later become addicted. Now it is very debatable on whether heroin or nicotine is harder to quit (they are the 2 always considered the most difficult). Heroin withdrawal is by far worse, like not even in the same universe as nicotine, but nicotine relapse is much more common than heroin. This is less due to the strength of the addiction but the availability and social acceptadness of nicotine. If you go out with friends, even if they know you are trying to quit, they will smoke in front of you and offer you a smoke. We don't tell smokers that are quitting to completely alter their social group to get rid of any smokers, we do that with heroin addicts. That means that triggers and cravings are much more common with nicotine use than heroin, couple this with the fact that relapsing on nicotine doesn't stand to destroy your life and relationships and it means that it is harder to stay quit from nicotine.   I think trying to say which drugs are harder to quit is an assinine activity though, for the cocaine addict that has never used heroin, cocaine will always be harder to quit. It is perspective. Statistically speaking though, nicotine addiction has a higher relapse rate than heroin, so that is why it is commonly cited as being harder to quit. Now, nobody can argue that nicotine is a much more addictive substance than heroin, those numbers are quantifiable with scientific evidence to back it up.
Common misconception! It's awesome!
Also I don't remember people making a huge outrage over it either since me changing my background doesn't affect anyone else at all.
Died a little inside. XD
Hate to break it to you, but... those are cocks.
Maybe I'm pretty daft, but I don't see what the first article has to do with the issue at hand, really.  As well, I am pretty skilled at recognizing most languages, especially east Asian, but if I had to guess without knowing I'd probably say that this was a ~~bi~~ tri-lingual sign (Chinese, Japanese, and English) posted at what could very possibly be a Chinese restaurant.  Why get all bent out of shape about it though, honestly?
It's 1 word, that is a lot different than TYPING AN ENTIRE SENTENCE IN "ALLCAPS", don't you think?  Look, I've been around the Internet a long time and 1 uppercase word is acceptable, a whole sentence, is not. That's the rules, learn em, live by em.
I agree with you.  2 hours seems a little long.  I would check message headers to see where the delay is.  They probably have a slow server doing the spam/virus/hr filtering.
Step 1: Acquire guitar skills and write songs Step 2: Showcase acquired skills to women Step 3: Monday-Saturday=Sexy time=All the time
As the only other one besides Danny here, I agree. Voted 'yea'.
TWENTY hours? Jesus.
Wait wait **wait** a sec.. you took a picture of your screen? And it's angled 90 degrees... you could use printscreen...
Is he French? Or a francophile?
So awesome how I join Reddit like a week after this takes place.  And by that, I mean it's REALLY not awesome, especially considering a couple people I know were there ¬_¬
Nah, I prefer MetaX, it has all the tagging features of iTunes, and then some.  Plus, you can mass-update videos just like in iTunes.
Bit the bullet and completely uninstalled Chrome and everything Chrome-related. Seems to be working fine after quitting now. No idea what it could have been, but thanks for the help.
Aaron Carter: Michael Jackson Gave Me Wine &amp; Cocaine (Age 15) 
Trolling people online is a definite sign of metal illness. You know what you are.
No, man. They are protesting because Merkel is buying their country and destroys the future of their children. And you can expect Nazi signs when the picture western European media give to their viewers is that the Greeks are lazy spoiled children.
Yoga Today!  They have a free video that changes every week on their website and some additional videos on Youtube.  It's just like a real-world yoga class, some teachers do sessions that up your heart rate, others are more about strength, others about flexibility, others about relaxation and inner strength.  The video up this week is a really great Ashtanga series that is great for beginners.
This is funny timing for me... We just held a Theology on Tap in LA at a local pub and had a panel discussion on Theodicy two days ago. 
It's not religion that causes genocide.  People who desire power will use any shitty tool you give them to manipulate people.  Religion is the opiate of the people, and the disguise of the rulers.
why would you comment if you cant read that I was hacked almost a week ago.
Are you joking? Her getting the manager to side with her = no tip. And then you were "banned"???? Burn that place down
Nothing really excites me more about a guitar than if it's packing a P-90 somewhere. I've come so close to sticking one in the neck position of my SG before, I've just never had the funds or balls to experiment like that unfortunately.   They are without doubt the coolest pickups around, not to mention the sound.
beaut
Damnnnnnnn.... they can dance!!!
It's a baby! Holy Shit! So many bricks!!!
That's why you should make your own beer and wine as well.  Waaaaay cheaper than buying beer regularly. 
It's an actual rule found in the sidebar. Well, I guess it's more a guideline, but saying that it's pretend and calling it retarded is kind of a dick move
Absolutely has to be a typo on the screen res. 
Get some [Bang snaps](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bang_snaps) or a cap gun, a partner, a clicker, and a whole bunch of hot dog. Read the [BAT basics PDF](http://ahimsadogtraining.com/handouts/BAT-basics.pdf). Folow the BAT guide, replacing the other dog as the trigger with your partner tossing a snap. You don't have a lot of time until the 4th, but you might be able to get him desensitized a bit.
No a theory is always the best explanation for all the evidence we have so far. It could be that new evidence doesn't fit into the current theory, which means we have to accommodate that, or that the theory is not yet complete, but there is nothing in the theory of evolution that would overthrow common descend, besides god comming down to earth and telling everyone that he just made it look that way, to fool scientists.  Common descend with current apes was in serious trouble, as we discovered that humans have 23 chromosome pairs, while hominidae have 24 pairs. Which would have meant our ancestors are way more back, similar to pigs. But what we did find was that Chromosome two was a fusion of Chromosome 2p and 2q ,found in hominidae, with a middle section consisting of telomeres, which are found at the ends of chromosomes and 2 sections of centromeres. 
Blue Dragon, Lost Odyssey. Both solid games with really interesting art direction. You should try Blue Dragon just for the boss battle theme.
1) No!  2) If you're in the military  3) Sure.
looks like oregano....or the debris from when i trim hedges. use it for cooking, wouldn't to be smoking that stuff
Safe and macro oriented doesn't mean never leaving your base.  Ideally, protoss should never allow zerg to feel safe to drone hard.  Obviously that's not going to happen but you should try and limit the windows where zerg can do this. It can be as easy as simply taking watch towers away from zerg.  Make them feel like a push is coming then back off.  You don't need to engage the army but just poke around.  Force zerg to make more units or at least delay making drones.  
so I had to test this quick and my results using shears are the following: I sheared 44 sheep and got: 7 times 4 wool, 16 times three and 21 times two. Thats an average of 2.68 wool per sheep. This low number of sheep is not *that* representative, i know, but i think you get the idea. Should be definitively more than without using shears: 2-4(or even 5) instead of 1-3 wool per sheep.
Saw a product I just bought on the sale, contacted customer support, and they gave me the reduced price..... best costumer service anywhere!
[Here is the actual report since I didn't see it cited in the article.](http://www.consumerreports.org/cro/magazine-archive/2011/august/food/fast-food/overview/index.htm)
im an atheist. i dont believe in fucking sins.  just give me that booty.
tons.
my bad, I didn't know you wanted to be in an unsuccessful company that goes broke after a year
For myself:  &gt; Ahpul, ohrinjiz uhn buhnahnahz.  I think we'd start having problems if we based written English off spoken English. 
and also thanks to the other redditors that have helped throughout the day sending invites...:)
I don't use a texture pack and i noticed it. If you hit a door (I saw it on a closed iron door) little purple specks pop out as if you were mining a purple cloth block.
Nice hyperbole in the title.  Instantaneous memory is an oxymoron.
Nope.
You had all of history to work with and you couldn't think of a new joke?
I've been keeping that in mind. I don't normally buy bottled water. For this, I had to pull out one of the 2G jugs from the earthquake kit.  I'm pretty sure this is one of the cheaper "bottle with tap water" quality.
Was she walking with an imaginary friend?
It's relevant because God being outside of time is why he can have knowledge of events before they happen without being the cause.  I can know that something is going to happen if I go and cause it, but that's different.  God can know what decision you will choose of your own free will, and have laid plans far in advance to work with your decision.  &gt;the discussion of a deterministic universe when we can have it without reference to time at all?  You feel we can have a discussion of determinism without talking about time?  That's pretty central to the determinism argument.  Heck, the term itself refers to time based causality.
I'll give it the old college try. 
&gt;Sure there are patterns, but as I specifically pointed out in my last post the pattern is that people choose the most socially acceptable labels. Correlation is not causation.  But clearly they don't choose the acceptable labels because they don't always feel it fits because their identity is coming from somewhere deeper than social formatting.  If their gender is not coming from the environment where is it coming from?  &gt; You are stuck in the heteronormative framework because you don't understand why people act against the social constructs that are put on them.  What is your explanation of why people rebel against the social models?  I am suggesting that they rebel for the same reasons people rebel against heterosexual norms. Because people are born that way. And further that there is a relationship between gender expression and orientation.
ahhh good mayport road memories, not!  San marco ent here!
EVERYTHING is better than sushi dot come...  
RIDE A BIKE!!!
unappreciated beauty. I think she's one of the most beautiful women in country music.
Why are they all women?
1) Orange 2) Yellow 3) Red 4) Pink (usually give these away because they taste waxy)
degreaser or soapy water combined with elbow grease and a [green scrubby](http://us.123rf.com/400wm/400/400/infotrontof/infotrontof1105/infotrontof110500011/9490774-green-scrub-sponges-isolated-on-white.jpg)
sometimes that backfires. if they're good friends it turns into "guess what derp's done now? blahblahblahgradesblahblahblah." i still use it as an opportunity to slink out of the room.
No joke, I'm going to have to speak up and not have as much beer in my mouth.
But no change was made... This wasn't mandatory to begin with. It was and will be a *payed option*.
That was not the case in my public secondary school in New York (not NYC).
Hey thanks, that was a good read.
Peanut Butter tracking is a natural skill to the breed.
/r/politics
im an atheist. i dont believe in fucking sins.  just give me that booty.
See, this is what I thought to, but he hasn't been to the other state that I'm aware of.  Which is why I thought it was weird he was getting charged there.
Hmm, I can't tell if you want punk bands with girl singers or punk bands that are more "gentle." If it's the latter, The Smoking Popes and newer stuff by The Bouncing Souls might be good. As for bands with female singers, The Muffs are pretty good. 
Wow, I thought this thread was going in a completely different direction... a direction which consisted of some sort of physical activity from said girlfriend. Which then would have led me to applaud you. 
pigs don't bark.
and also thanks to the other redditors that have helped throughout the day sending invites...:)
Don't play on peaceful.
How worth it is the "Back to the Future" set? I enjoyed the Sam + Max series by Telltale, is it comparable?
Or saying that   "The reason you like it so much is because your brain has not evolved as far as some people."   Are you seriously asking why I stated your comment was personal or offensive? I hope you aren't like this in real life, for the sake of your friends(?)/family.
Is this a joke?
Have you ever heard the saying: "If you don't like the weather, wait a day."?   It applies quite well to Reddit.  Not every page will look the same every day, but sometimes they won't change as often as you'd like. So, posts like [Who wants to reduce the flagrant karma-whoring](http://www.reddit.com/r/gaming/comments/icoif/who_wants_to_reduce_the_flagrant_karmawhoring_and/) and [If you look at r/politics, whine whine things will never change](http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/ic9uq/if_you_look_at_r_politics_today_youll_see_exactly/) will be as ever occurrent as the picture submissions you're peeved about now.   If you're like me, the posts bitching about a trend are more annoying than the nuisance in question. The bottom line is this: if you start enforcing rules that **917** out of **566,584** readers concluded was a good idea, you're going to run off the other 99.9984%.
All I know of is Tallahassee's standard Tom Brown fireworks and several bands playing.
This actually happened once: A 4-way free-for-all EDH tournament. As EDH tournaments go, this was relatively serious as the top prize was a $100 or so card.  At some point I notice that 2 of my opponents both have an Academy Ruins on the board. We figure out that these must have been on the board for at least 3 turns, and the reason this took a while is because the guy that played the second one didn't put much effort into announcing it. To make matters worse, the previous 2 turns (which would be the 2 turns of the guys with the ruins) were both filled with very bomby plays and included them tapping out. Both players clearly had no other land in hand.  There was no judge there, so one of the organizers of the event eventually decided that both lands would be sent to the graveyard and that was that.  Was that correct? What would you have done?
"FINALLY!"
THEN WHO WAS MAYOR?
I could see someone breaking their ankle or having a serious fall if their foot got stuck while someone opened the door.
my bad, I didn't know you wanted to be in an unsuccessful company that goes broke after a year
Are you certified at all? Ask them to pay for relevant industry certs to make up the salary deficit. RHCE, CCNA, VCP, are all great to start. The RHCE is $750 per take (last time I looked). Vmware VCP class (or really any class they offer) starts at 3k and is mandatory for the VCP.
ahhh good mayport road memories, not!  San marco ent here!
i keep getting connection refused. Why?
Work hard, Keep at it. Repeat. You'll get there.
Are you fucking kidding me... a smiling cat? Fantasy. Pure Fantasy.
It's quite impressive, really.  This article in the LA Times managed to refer to San Francisco as both "Frisco" and "San Fran".  It's almost as though they were trying to be ignorant about that kind of thing.
And the tax breaks for owing a mortgage.
Is there anyone really, honestly surprised by this news? This was somewhat more of an open secret along the lines of 'Israel have nukes' and China is a human rights violator. 
beaut
you hilarious son of a bitch!
I have one of these mirrors which makes me not have a blind spot ($20):  http://i.imgur.com/sdbg3.jpg  (That is not me nor my car, I would never hot glue glow in the dark stars to my roof; I love my car.)
If there is a god, he is probably doing this just to make Perry look bad.  I can't see anyone (even/especially God) liking that bad egg.
It's only been a few days.  I would encourage you to stick it out for a while longer.  Never know what's going on in your boss's personal life.  Maybe he's getting a divorce, maybe his dog is sick, etc.  It doesn't give him the right to yell at you, but I wouldn't give up a decent job unless I knew that this behavior was here to stay.
No one could write hits like "Suck a Cheetahs Dick" and "Rock and Roll McDonalds" quite like Wesley.
Thanks for that :) It cleared it up a bit...I think hehe Basically I have a small grow box which is about 40cm width,60cm length and 60cm in hight, I have a 125w cfl lamp in there now. It produces an all right grow but maybe I should just upgrade my lamp up to something with a lot more power but with more power comes more heat etc and with such a small box I think it might be a bit of fire hazard if I got  about 250w lol I Haven't been doing this long so still at the noob stage even though this is my 2nd harvest. I just want  something small that would fit perfectly in the box but if it's not enough for even one plant I will have a better look around and see what I can afford. 
If you are interested in seeing how much this idea would cost then vote this comment up.   Otherwise vote this comments down. **Note:** I do not care about comment karma and that is why I am asking you to vote this up and down rather than the post itself. You can vote the post itself up and down however you normally would.
What about Banana Phone!
heh, "my kind", thanks for the chuckle! holy cow, so you're over 50?!   excellent, its good to see another 40 plus-er on here, i'm hot on your heals, 42 to be exact.   my assumption was you were young was for two reasons;   1) this is reddit, home of the youth, and 2) you sound pretty idealistic for a 50 year old.   mind if i ask what you do for a living?   
That was quiet creepy.
1. He freaks me the fuck out.  2. It pisses me off that blizzard spent more time on him than on doing anything useful for slag pits.  They might as well put this guy right in the middle of the map.  That way, at least something will be going on there.
Think of the rookies in the draft, they all just bought escalades and new homes and have no paycheck hahahaha
##YOTSUBA
Is the big qualm with circumcision these days related to infant circumcision?   Because I was circumcised when I was 5 or so   I vividly remember the trip home, not fun   However, I do think it looks better, and I would get it done were I not already circumcised
We've got this! Just hang around them long enough and eventually they'll tire out :D
did you get shit on your dick?
you don't even skip On the Run? I dunno how you sit through that.  I'd have to go with The Wall, Radiohead's OK Computer or Kanye West's Late Registration. I don't have many albums where I don't skip at least one song to begin with, it's weird. There's always just that one song that I can't stand.
And there it is. I wrote back again but it was a little sarcastic and probably a little hostile, so I won't post it, I doubt responses to responses are even read
Earl Sweatshirt.  Young age, knew what was best for him by going to a boarding school and supporting his mother, sick lyricism.  He'll come back and dominate the hip hop scene harder than his debut 'EARL' did for sure.  
~~Google+ invite would be awesome thanks :)~~
Salt and pepper.
I found this oddly endearing. Made me feel like a child again.
well played jspegele,well played...
really long flights
If this means anything it is that the average  American Woman is now fat.  
Yes, and those are factors that can and do shift, particularly when something significant changes markets, like the advent of sourcing directly and buying online. Couple that with rising fuel costs and increased unemployment and it will be interesting to see how we adapt. Particularly,  there is an increasing movement to DIY and community sourced/created items. I would be surprised to see more people looking closer to home.
Both series of Spaced are on 4OD in full - go and watch them, you'll thank us later.
RIDE A BIKE!!!
I actually intentionally read pdfs on my laptop this way.  I can get a whole page on the screen at once at a reasonable soom level and it puts my arrow keys in a perfect position to be operated by thumb to navigate the document.
Hate it.  I am refering specifically to the black bar of course.  Why do i dislike it? --It is at too much of a contrast to the entire rest of the screen, which is light colours above *and* below. It grabs my attention far too much. I would go as far as to say 'annoying'. Yes, I can understand how that seems stupid.  FYI, I have never had any negative feelings about google design than this, so I don't feel i'm hating just because its different. Other than the bar its all good.
Frank McCourt, the owner of the Los Angeles Dodgers. Sorry guys, I should have clarified... unless he did indeed die today while I was at work...
Um... No. You're missing the point. Public bathrooms are pretty disgusting places, so if you're a germophobe it makes total sense to want to refrain from touching something that is contaminated with bits of everyone's poo.
And I thought this was about the tv-series
I think the *feel* of the games was drastically different, and is what causes the difference in emotions. I personally liked the mystical feel of OoT to the festive, loud, and frightening feel of MM. It was still entertaining, no doubt, but I just prefer OoT.
why yes, you are definitely too hot for anything but boots... :)
It never hurts to have a [back up](http://www.bettercallsaul.com/)
Omlette du fromage... **Omlette du fromage**, omlette du fromage! Omlette du fromage - omlette du fromage? Omlette du fromage. Omlette du fromage, *omlette du fromage*?
["So cute... bye bye!"](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=L-f_la5s3mk) cracks me up every time :D
Trust me, I know!  I inherited this network about 2 months ago and this site is only a week old.  We have a Zentyal box going in but not for a month and I need this site up ASAP.  We will have web traffic to the Zentyal and host exchange on the 2003 box for another 2 months, then swap out to an Exchange2010/Server2100 platform for all other services.  This place is a mess and I am just trying to enable functionality until we are at a place to deploy the new config.  I hate MS, but they certainly pay my bills!  EDIT:  Also running PHP and PPTP VPN(for Exchange Access) as wel as BES for the Blackberries.  I think I attract the problem children.
&gt;I will never understand why people are so eager to have it "taxed and regulated."  Because otherwise we'll never get it at all.
Aww. I make a cute gurl in drag!
The easiest option, of course, is to get a puppy and a kitten.
Because bathroom space in Japan is the size of a coffin. Look at that picture. You barely have room to take a shit in there. 
Just because a scientist patents a supplement, that doesn't mean there is evidence of its effectiveness.  A patent is a business decision, and business decisions are often made on hunches (because if you wait around for conclusive evidence, someone else who was willing to take a bigger risk than you were will probably already have scooped up the opportunity).  If you want to make a credible claim that these supplements help with lucid dreaming more than a placebo would, please cite to a controlled study demonstrating such effect.
&gt;Sure there are patterns, but as I specifically pointed out in my last post the pattern is that people choose the most socially acceptable labels. Correlation is not causation.  But clearly they don't choose the acceptable labels because they don't always feel it fits because their identity is coming from somewhere deeper than social formatting.  If their gender is not coming from the environment where is it coming from?  &gt; You are stuck in the heteronormative framework because you don't understand why people act against the social constructs that are put on them.  What is your explanation of why people rebel against the social models?  I am suggesting that they rebel for the same reasons people rebel against heterosexual norms. Because people are born that way. And further that there is a relationship between gender expression and orientation.
an ant didn't choose to be an ant, it's still an ant.  Racism and sexism aren't wrong because they act on traits that we can't change, they're wrong because they act on traits that aren't relevant to the issue at hand.
Angry Birds. Don't hate me.
I don't use a texture pack and i noticed it. If you hit a door (I saw it on a closed iron door) little purple specks pop out as if you were mining a purple cloth block.
No one in the world sits at home thinking "I could leave now, but my time is more important than anyone else's so I'll sit around and eat bonbons for a few minutes before I leave."
Poopicus 34: Thou shalt not stickith your penis in the other person butt hole, thank you.
I'm sorry, I... I was on digg until just a few months ago. I tried to make it work - tried to forgive it for its past transgressions - but things only got worse.
Eh. For awhile I was wondering why it was that everypony was so affected by it, while I couldn't care less about it. And then I realized that it was because not everyone reads as much fanfiction as me, so it's kind of funny seeing everyone freak out. I personally think the story was well written, if lacking a plot.
* Oranges. I got heartburn from eating too many a few years ago. I was eating maybe four a day.  * Pretty much any other fruit. Strawberries, cherries, watermelon, honeydew, cantaloupe, blueberries, blackberries, pears, apples, grapefruits, mango, bananas, and more. Sadly, I can't stomach coconut, though coconut flavoring is awesome.  * Ranch wheat thins. My snackexchange buddy got me addicted.  * Cracker jack.  * Pirate's booty and cheesy popcorn.  * Oreos. Or Cookies N Cream ice cream. Mmmm, ice cream. Brownie ice cream from Crepes &amp; Waffles is glorious.  * Carrots and peanut butter. Apples and peanut butter.  * Kettle corn. Nothing like getting to salt it yourself. Tastes like corn too!  * Bread. Just don't let it have sesame or sunflower seeds. Allergies, whee.  * Lightly sweetened yogurt. Morocco has delicious yogurt. Pistachio yogurt, hell yeah.  * Whipped cream.  * Chocolate. Big fan of dark chocolate, as well as truffles.  * Reese's Peanut Butter Cups. And Kit-Kats.  * Chewing gum. I'm addicted. My jaw is ridiculously strong now (I can chew a pack of gum without getting sore).  * Samosas (that's right, I'm combining posts since I agree with them).  * Frosted Flakes.  * Trader Joe's has some awesome Pita Chips and such. Stew Leonard's has yummy apple cider donut holes. Drool.  God, I love food. I could go on and on.
I own 282 games on Steam.  There are at least 150 I have never even installed.
LOL I snorted pepsi max out of my nose.
Welcome to TvP.
Why cant i log in anymore. it says connection refused. does that mean you removed me from the whitelist  Dwise91
This sounds like a fake unless you name the restaurant.
I don't look to turn someone away from Christianity. But I do look to turn them away from bigotry, to help open their eyes in how their unthinking support of laws that strip rights away can bee seen as religious oppression. I will also argue for reason and against superstition. Faith, I have no problem with if it helps you. Try to teach children in public school that the Earth is only 6K old, I will challenge that. Deny homosexuals the right to marry because YOUR beliefs state it's a sin, I'll challenge that. Allow the organization supporting your religious beliefs to continue sheltering evil behavior, I have a problem with that. Minor foibles by individuals come with any organization. But when the ratio becomes disproportional (see Congress for another example of an institutional corruption unchecked), it needs to be addressed.  &gt;I do know God is real. Jesus is LORD.   No you don't. You believe God is real, you hope God is real, you're going to act as if God is real. But you don't know. If you did, you wouldn't need faith. You have personal experience that you accept as evidence. I get that. But by that light, all believers "know" that their god exists.  &gt;I'm just making sure you know what you're doing is actually worse than a casual unbeliever.   No it's not, because I'm not against the belief you have so much as against the institutions of money and power that have grown up out of those beliefs, and the bigotry that is a side dish that seems to grow in the dark corners. Your personal testimony of God isn't the issue. When you vote to keep "In God We Trust" on our money is. All citizens don't trust in god, and government shouldn't be at all involved in this concept.  &gt;You are partly responsible for every little evil thing someone does that you influence. We'll all see judgment someday.   There is no way I can be responsible for anything someone else chooses to do. If there were, then aren't I also responsible for all the good things I've encouraged people to do by being a good example, by speaking out against the evils their pastor/priest/church is continuing to do?  &gt; Do you really want things more difficult on you for being responsible for other's sin? Jesus is the only one who gets you out of that.  If there is a God (I doubt it, but I could be wrong), and he's a just god, then I won't be punished at all for speaking out about the dangers, evils, and corruption in religious institutions any more than I will be punished for speaking out against these same problems in government.  &gt;Why do you want to wait til the last minute to accept him?  I won't be "accepting" him because there is no evidence he is any more of a god than am I. Accepting some of his teachings, sure. Jesus taught much that is worthwhile. Some is not. But I cannot "accept him" without believing the following:  1. God exists 2. God created the Universe 3. God has a plan for mankind 4. We are God's children 5. Jesus was the Son of God (sorry those who believe in the Trinity, that just cannot make sense to me!) 6. Becoming a Disciple is the only way to be "saved"  I don't believe ANY of those things. I can't pretend, if God is real he would know I was lying and judge me worse for that. All I could do is say, "I lived my life the best way I could figure out. If you wanted me to believe, perhaps you should have spoken up in a way I would accept. Or made it possible for me to 'just believe'. As it was, sorry, but there was far too much data to suggest that religions were man-made institutions and not godly institutions."
Also, Fossum is pitching, he was on the team ages ago.
I'm pretty sure it is actually sarcasm....
Well now you can go to the pokemon league and maybe you can even become the champion!
&gt;several female KBR female employees who were prostituting themselves  Mercenaries come in all flavors.
Like [this?](http://i.imgur.com/6VAJl.gif)
I sifted through 1500 submissions today just to find this gold at the end of my Reddit rainbow.
 #subnav { margin: 30px auto 0; *zoom:1; /* + */  }   #subnav ul#nav li { margin-right: 3px; /* - */ text-align: center; float:left; /* + */  }   #subnav ul#nav a { float: left; /* - */ padding: 5px 0; /* - */ text-decoration: none; width: 10em; display:block; /* + */ line-height: 21px; /* + */  }   .clearfix {clear:both; margin:0; padding:0; height:0; line-height:0; } /* add: font-size:0 */  The layout itself is pretty weird in spots. Looks kinda fragile to me.  Put an IE&lt;9 conditional comment around html5.js.  **Edit:**  The header:   #body-container h1 { color: #3A3A86; font-family: Helvetica,Verdana,Arial,sans-serif; font-size: 30px; font-weight: normal; line-height: 50%; /* - */ line-height: 1; /* + */  }
&gt;Income tax above 350k, and Corporate Taxes are EXTREMELY low and are in dire need of being updated.  Income tax at that rate is 10% and goes up to 11% at over a million dollars. How is that EXTREMELY low? Probably on par with some of the highest State taxes in the country.   As far as corporate taxes are concerned, I have a corporation and I have to pay 800 dollars a year in taxes even if I lose money. Most states don't have anything like that.   And also, spending has increased in California. Even if you take state spending as a percentage of GDP, it's gone up another [2% of gdp](http://www.usgovernmentspending.com/downchart_gs.php?year=1992_2015&amp;view=1&amp;expand=&amp;units=p&amp;log=linear&amp;fy=fy12&amp;chart=F0-state&amp;bar=1&amp;stack=1&amp;size=m&amp;title=&amp;state=CA&amp;color=c&amp;local=s) and that's looking at spending in the best possible light. And California was running big deficits before. It's finally caught up to us.
And I feel bad for not knowing if my (mom's) dog is 5 or 6 years old.  E:'
I think you totally misinterpreted that, but I fucked up the diagram because I didn't pay attention to formatting and I was really stoned, so I'm fixing it.
Here are some questions I've had in the past:  * what are the advantages of a javascript library like jQuery or Prototype? Disadvantages? Which do you prefer, why, etc. * how do you usually size text (em, %, px), and why? * what do you think of CSS frameworks/grid systems? * what is the difference between XHTML and HTML? (you should be able to talk a bit about mime types here) * what are some common ie6, ie7 bugs? * what are some common cross-browser issues? * what is your opinion on using tables for layout? (no brainer) * what are your favourite/most commonly used web developer tools, browser extensions, etc.?  You might also get some HTML5 questions, so I would be familiar with some of the new elements, localstoroage, etc.
Move along
Looks glorious! How did it smoke?
&gt; Of the shapes that I saw in their beds.  That helped quite a bit. :P Pretty good.
oh wait! i do get it.. the sun, the planets and space travel!! love it. 
Was he part of the "evzones"? Is he tall btw?
&gt;We don't stand up at public ceremonies and pray along with them.   wut  &gt;Beliefs based on privileging faith over reason are actively dangerous. They can be. But not all christian beliefs are supported solely on faith. Christian support for homosexuality, for example, isn't something taken on faith.  &gt;The tolerant Christians provide cover and legitimacy to the intolerant ones. Again, I hear this a lot but don't see any evidence. All liberal christians I've talked to or heard of actively dislike and denounce evangelicals, especially ones who actively oppress gays, let alone give them bullets by being cool with gays.
Try VirtualDub
Shop around, figure out how much a Dr. visit would be then message me the cost.  I'll see if I can get you a money transfer.  Charity&gt;government
1) Orange 2) Yellow 3) Red 4) Pink (usually give these away because they taste waxy)
this fuckin kid right here
No. I'm thinking of people like [RealCompleteNerdom](http://www.reddit.com/user/RealCompleteNerdom "choad") who never comment and never contribute anything but their own blog links. If you've got a blog with original content then share it, by all means.  Then hang out and be part of the community and share other things too.  Based upon your post history, the ban hammer is not looking at you.
What does MIC stand for?
I tend to agree with you. Mark was on a crusade where he would light up joints and smoke them in front of every cop shop in every city or town that he visited. I'm all for legalizing a plant that shouldn't be outlawed but if you are going to walk around and shove it in law enforcement's faces then I think you are asking for trouble and it doesn't help the movement whatsoever. The fact that medical mj is legal and the whole movement has slowly made leaps and bounds compared to what it was like in the 80's I don't think it's the right move to flaunt it in front of the cops pissing them off and making them look like fools. They are certainly going to do something about it then.
I'm not sure, that is why I said if another offer is made, you should take it.
TIL when I stare at women, they like it.
Upvote for use of The Doctor gif.
That's why you should make your own beer and wine as well.  Waaaaay cheaper than buying beer regularly. 
Though I see the point of your question, I can only offer my opinion as a woman.  I'm 24, and if a young boy messaged me in a chat room (assuming I even go to chat rooms. Who does anymore? lol), and was adamant about meeting me, I'd have suspicions that he was a rapist or something. 
At the end of T3 I thought that the ending was so absurd that I started laughing hysterically, prompting everyone else there to start laughing hysterically as well. Then I shouted LIMEWIRE IS SKYNET! just to cap it all off. Seemed to go over pretty well.   There was another time when there was an ad for Coke and I shouted something that had everyone cracking up but I can't remember what I said so I'll just leave now.
But, if you've never been to North Carolina I'd say you've got a pretty good defense against the ticket don't you?
i dont see why not.  i mean, evolution has produced some crazy shit.  yellow eyes are probably not all that unlikely.
3GS - I'm a pretty heavy app user so I have a charger on my desk at work and one at home. I'll charge during the day if the battery runs low and charge every night.
Getting there; I dig on Ye Olde School Bugs Bunny, the old time, violent, sometimes racist stuff.  Daffy Duck vs the Nazi's ftw
Did Ted ever come back from the cave?
I'm sorry?
I doubt the cops would do anything. Especially for $7. And as long as he's standing there he's not doing more deliveries, some of which might already be in his car getting cold and late.  I'd say he'd be pretty much screwed and just have to cut his losses. 
Here you go!   http://imgur.com/aw7ht   And, thanks! :-)
The placement of your thumb makes me think you're covering something up.
I can't find any option to invite anyone, sorry!  Yet another first world problem!
FUDGE dice FTW!
Pics or it didn't happen
it isn't a threat if it is what people desire
I use FormatFactory, there might be better ones.
There is much more pointless posts in reddit, i don't see a reason to bitch about this one
Then how will you imagine his mad laughter?
Heh heh...   Butz...
It's limited because for every minute of entertainment, they want you to see three minutes of commercials.
Bachelor Frog:  Pee on the Floor,  Spray febreeze and call it fancy marble.
damn it : /
Oxi allo polemo = no more war / not another war.
Where are there outlets to charge your laptop.....every single plane I have been on has never had this.
I'm wondering if borrowing from SS and other retirement funds helps validate your point or not...  Not to mention those actions did very little to reduce the national debt, or control spending in general...
Even the "family illness" update itself is inspiring. Somehow it manages to convey a message of unity and fraternity for those with cancer-related troubles. People with cancer are not alone. The ability to put that in writing is somewhat extraordinary, especially in such circumstances. Opened my eyes more than a pink ribbon ever has. Not to diminish the value of pink ribbons.  Here's to all cancer-afflicted friends, families and patients. You are constantly in our minds and hearts. Feel the sunlight. Remember to dream.
For any other scenario, I would have to agree with you. I often recommend the i5-2500K in /r/buildapc, but I feel that OP would have benefited from hyperthreading for rendering programs that are primarily CPU and memory bound.
She went to the cleaners to remove a spit-stain.  *That's* why it's the ultimate troll.
Best comment in this thread courtesy of niudropout :  &gt;The church of team liquid has deemed this content impure and will hereby censor it so that the eyes of the righteous may never glance upon it.
Well, as other people mentioned and I looked at the video to confirm, Colbert looked like a kid in a candy store when the FEC gave the thumbs up for him to create this SuperPAC.  I think the situation was the FEC really couldn't prevent it, they just had to determine whether the media exemption would apply.  Which it only halfway does, and in a halfway manner that Fox does NOT want it to apply, i.e. they have to report when they are funding ads on other channels (everyone already knows that if the candipundits are on Fox News then Fox News is footing the bill, there really isn't an overriding need to report that since the limits on contributing to SuperPACs is basically unlimited).  Now that the FEC has drawn its line in the sand, it is up to Colbert to drive the whole SuperPAC concept into the ground by abusing all the leeway the current campaign finance rules and the FEC have allowed in as unrestricted a manner as possible.
i would be happy to finish on her buns.
[This](http://huntme4sport.com/post/6736447139/hunt-me-for-sport) is the most important post, yes I should have just used it for the original link. 
The first time I went in the "guy's area" (READ: free weights) I was intimidated simply because there were these huge, muscular guys and I'm super tiny.  Turns out the biggest guys are the nicest, and most helpful. 
That job doesn't pay enough. For $2 million a year I might take it and fix things. But that's my bottom line. That's half what I made my last year in the business world. The current pay is ridiculous.   One term is all I would need to fix things. Maybe less so I would need a competent VP. I think maybe Petraeus might be a good pick. Although I have promised that spot to tzvika613.
&gt;The "forced arbitration" clause is in every rental agreement, sales contract, employment contract and service contract you sign.   That doesn't make it right. Not to mention that the company is typically the one retaining the arbitration house. If an arbitration house decides too many cases in favor of the little guy, the company might take their business elsewhere.   &gt;So the arbitration claim is included to keep the escalating cost of lawsuits out of the bottom line. If we weren't living in such a litigious society where a lawsuit against a company is seen as the ticket to wealth, maybe it wouldn't be there but we do and it is.  That is in no way, shape, or form my problem.   &gt;Think about it, one jury that just happens to take the side of a persuasive lawyer and the company can go out of business. They have to protect themselves.  Then maybe they shouldn't do shitty things? Just a thought. 
Now you do too &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Yes, but people don't die from nicotine withdrawls.
My views, if you're curious, are that we're moving to a point in population and mobility where it doesn't make sense to have things like states.  Rather, we should just have smaller scale collectives of people that can determine their own social policies for themselves, only loosely confederated. I think that this would sort out many of the problems with effects not being felt by decision makers and much of the creation of perverse incentives (ie, creating incentives for 'bad' behavior). I, additionally, think that problems in replacing structures for say, building freeway systems would be outweighed by the benefits of decisions being local to those they impact.  Further, I think that we should encourage (and certainly enable!) the movement of people between collectives so that they can form groupings with similar social views and people are neither trapped in a place they don't wish to be nor coerced to participate in a system they find intolerable.  It's likely that we'd find many of these collectives operating in a generally socialist or even communist fashion - that's fine, perhaps even ideal, as cooperation has *always* been the best human strategy.  I do think, though, that it would solve the problem that many people in the US feel about not paying in to such systems, once they were able to observe what they did compared to ones forced to compete. I think it would also solve the problem of people not wanting to pay in to the society for benefits they enjoy: we can kick them out more easily for not wanting to participate.  The main point though: states on top of collectives are superfluous and harm people who don't wish to be included, ergo, we should switch over to a system of confederated collectives at a smaller scale.
De nada.
COMBO BREAKER [](/foreveralonelaugh)
Before Groupon came along, that's how the building seemed, at least.
And existentialism finally makes its way into F7U12 full force
Glad it was enjoyable.
It's good that I'm English then isn't it!
AAAH been looking for something like this for so long!!! THANKS OP! Now how to get one sent here....
Penis penis penis creeper penis penis pony penis penis.
I've made a huge mistake...
I literally just said "woah" outloud.  Also, that is a great name...
It's a gay foot fetish thing -- *you wouldn't understand.*
why don't you guys have tire pressure gauges on the free air hoses?
That was one popular song a loooong time ago and he also hit the news when his daughter released the video in which he was so drunk. He's bigger in the States now. You guys even made a reality show about his family and it didn't even air here.  Having cleared up this myth, the "Knight Rider" TV series was one of my favorites as a kid... but so was  "MacGyver".... and "Hercules"... and "Xena"... and "Quantum Leap"... and "Mash"... and so many others. 
The Streets "The Edge of a Cliff".  (http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VFLdIGNUKuw)  The lyrics are worth a read and a contemplation.
Dear lord that site makes me never want to buy that.
Scrolling down, wondering what that problem seems to be...  Oh, snap!  Hope you're right soon.
Upvote for your jab at r/bicycling
Way to go [ThePettingZoo](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/ichm6/proof_that_jersey_shore_is_fake_magical_socks/)!
I want to party with this guy. 
Perhaps an alternative would be to take a screenshot of relevant articles and post a link to that instead?
I think I meant to put this under your earlier reply, sorry.
FAKE !
Pyros are better against buildings if there is a large distance between them.  The heavies movements speed (or spin up time if he GRU's to get in close) can be very punitive to getting much done).  The only issue I've found is when pyros are using the degreaser against wrangled sentries.  It still works but if your pyro doesn't know to angle in to get the engi/sentry simultaneously you're going to spend a lot of time chewing through the shield and the engi's repairs.  I use the degreaser myself so it's something new people should know.
And why do you see it this way? If the rich can keep people around and they buy shit for centuries constantly, then why would they want people to die off? Most of the world lives paycheck to paycheck already and throughout their entire lives on top of that.
Sam Harris is clearly the undouchiest, nicest one of the bunch, but boy does Deepak Choprah test his limits when they share a stage. It's all he can do not to just call him a moron.
PAW PAW?!?!?!?
Want. That. Rack.
This is the same picture used for the [My god has a hammer](http://pagansmurfen.ath.cx/web/my-god-has-a-hammer.jpg) poster, which is a picture of Thor.  Just some random info: we spell his name TOR here in Norway. as we call Thursday - Torsdag (Thor's day) and his trusty hammer is spelled MJØLNER (as apposed to Mjolnir). because we apparently thought having three extra letters in the alphabet was a good idea.
Here's his famed lawn mower on a stick. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PbK9eybE35E&amp;feature=related
If true, there's an upside:  All those closet pedophiles and perverts are going to get some karma.
....What the fuck did i just watch.....
The PSEO college program.  I could choose a major since I was taking college courses.
Did you even read the rest of what he wrote? I'm fairly certain stufff could overlook a 'brain-meltingly stupid story', if the other stuff didn't exist. I know I could.
Like the others have said, if you aren't going to be doing tricks, you can spend the 200$ on a decent commuter bike on craigslist.   If you're set on having a bmx bike, then what you will get for $200 isn't going to be the greatest. Having said that, you said you won't be doing any tricks on it, so I'd just start checking out craigslist. The bike you listed is something that would work for you, although that guy's price seems a little high. Maybe that's just my opinion though.   I would avoid trying to find a new bike online. For $200, you're not going to get a medium/high quality bmx bike. That $200 will get you a better bike on craigslist, though, since it will be used.
Getting all the potatoes in the Portal 2 ARG in 2 days.  Seemed infuriating and time consuming at the time, but looking back it was fun simply because of the variety and creativity in all those indie games, and it was a refreshing break from my TF2 obsession.  Plus I got the Valve Complete Pack out of it.
I work at a University, I have to know.  And with that, I also have a business email address. ~~You still haven't explained your argument.  Please extrapolate, because it still doesn't make much sense.~~ Do you mean that the teachers of your child all have strange emails? It could also be the fact that they use that email more than any other one.  There are professors here at my university who do the same.  Yes, their email addresses look idiotic, but we've all kind have come to expect some strange names.  It doesn't make the email sent unprofessional.  What makes the email unprofessional is the content within it.  
That's true for some electronics, and I am sure to take that into account when considering an item. I do not waste time on time-sensitive things like tablets. But take computer mice as an example- the life cycle for a Logitech mouse can range from 8 months to a year or more. If I decide in one week or one month whether I want to bring in the new trackball they are making (a surprisingly strong category of mouse) it doesn't matter much.
For heaven's sake man, its a SIMPLE QUESTION. Do you server a set menu on a Sunday?
Seriously, just read the FAQ, it will answer 90 % of the questions people have.
Objects in the mirror are exactly where they appear.
They need to make a vigor out of Ken Levine's juices, he is living genius
I'm Ron Burgundy?
"a band full of redditors"  this would be the BEST...BAND...NAME...EVER!!!  congrats on your single. i'll definitely give it a listen.
I agree, and by using your shoe instead of your hand, you're making the handle even dirtier than it would have been if you'd used your hand.
My roll of 35mm kodachrome and kodachrome super 8 cartridge are now totally useless then - bugger! 
[](/rtroll "I'd like to make a cameo")^~ (Forgetting someone?)
[He-man sings it better](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fy6faAgrLg4)
Your post makes me quite glad I don't do olympic style fencing.
To whom exactly is this news? People who watch Fox don't care, and people who care don't watch Fox.
Prostitution should be legal.  Prostitution and drugs do no cause ghettos.  It's to opposite: Ghettos cause illegal activities.  That's why there is a correlation.  The harsh economic conditions of ghettos leave people desperate enough to disobey the law.  Illegal drugs, prostitution, and other black market activities are big money because there is little competition.  There are many guys who wouldn't mind spending some money for no strings sex.  There are also women who are willing to have sex for cash.  When you disillusion yourself, prostitution is just an exchange benefiting two parties.  The main basis behind the anti-prostitution side is that women who are desperate for money will be exploited.  This is just lingering chivalry.  It's just like how we don't put women into combat situations.  Our military exploits men, but that's fine.  Dangerous occupations exploit men, but that's fine.  Divorce exploits men, but that's fine.  It's find for men to be exploited because of their free will, yet women must be protected.  I say no.
Butter!
I think you totally misinterpreted that, but I fucked up the diagram because I didn't pay attention to formatting and I was really stoned, so I'm fixing it.
Thank you for the poop, Smith.
His name is Robert Paulson.
Borgore could provide some good lines about her.
Does it, though?
Burn. 
In other words, it's just a joke!
In order to breath while crucified in such a manor you would have to push up with your legs to get a deep enough breath to live. So actually when crucified you were left there for three days and if you weren't dead by then they broke your legs to prevent you from getting a good breath and then took you down. after the third day when they went to break Jesus's legs they realized he was all ready dead.  so as to take no chances they stabbed him in the side with a spear and called it good. [citation needed?]
ha! integral *snort*
Holy shit dude! I know what you did was kinda wrong but, man I need to learn some online game from you brotha. Don't worry though, I think she's gonna break it off with the fiance and she'll be yours soon enough
That is everything that is right and wrong with the current doctor. 
I usually pirate games to try them out, and if I like them, I buy them. Too many times have I wasted my money on shitty games. 
haha yes! 
wow
http://blip.tv/projectlore  Especially this one: http://blip.tv/projectlore/project-lore-episode-11-2-1367994
I had the other cop car from all the 70s movies...1971 Dodge Coronet Custom. Literally bought it from a little old lady for 2000 dollars with 39000 original miles. Big as a whale and felt like driving a sofa. Fucking awesome.
Jesus christ dude, if your ability to converse could be bottled and sold, I'd IV inject that shit. THANK YOU! This is precisely the level of quasi-sexual sarcasm that my style of humor naturally exudes, you've just made it relevant to the female--   Confidence level RISING!
Where the hell do you get that from?
Pretty much how I look in the morning. Here is the [after](http://angelinajoliegossip.com/wp-content/uploads/2011/02/angelina-jolie-1.jpg) pic.
this is a gif, but what does it do!?
The hell is going on with this country? &gt;:o
I am, in a relatively short amount of time, probably going to fuck up my life in one or more ways. AMA!
He wasn't being an asshole, he was just making a statement. 
It's A Wonderful Life
That's the best story I've heard all day.
He said season five? It your brain who be derping, or did he edit it
Most of the time when someone simply says "upvote", they're downvoted.. in my own experience, that is.
Thank You!!!   For anyone who wants to see it:  http://harrypotter.wikia.com/wiki/Main_Page
TIL ^
Follow him to the Batcave!
No problem, hope it helps.
Post it.
Here's one JK owner who waves at every Jeep she passes. But you're right, most do not.
"Give me a chance to shine, and I'm gonna blind the world" (Transplants)
Did you ever at one time download a costume specifically for one character before buying the Klassic Pack? If you did, you need to delete it from your the Mortal Kombat folder in your harddrive
It looks amazing! Absolutely love it - who did it? 
Experiences, with all Es.
Yeah [here it is](http://www.reddit.com/r/California/comments/icye3/attempt_3_at_a_new_logo_this_time_i_incorporated/)!
I kinda want to pet it. Cute lil bugger
Edited to put a comma after diverted.  Does that help?  =)
I has 1?
"These three games are Chess, Go, and Backgammon, representing Destruction, Creation, and Fate, respectively. Of the three, Chess is the only one that begins with all of the pieces on the board."  Someone doesn't know how backgammon works.
Everything about this pleases me.
the megaton hammer works well too!
BAJEEZUS.  I really don't understand how clothing size corresponds to body type, I'm a size 10 but I am not nearly as gorgeously curvaceous as you.
Content with Substance  Continuation of greed  Cut and Self  Dyadic seed  Architectonic future  Useless Journey of Despair.
Somebody needs to take all of the shots with your face in them and composite them in Photoshoooooop.
I carry a notebook with me everywhere and everything that comes spilling out of my head goes into a notebook.  Snippets of stories, character moments, scraps of dialogue, plans for my future, marketing strategies, problems I'm having, all of it.  And it helps doubly because whenever I run out of steam I have this huuuuuge backlog of stuff hanging around that I can look at.  Largely, I've forgotten most of it or turned it into a story, but I'll ALWAYS come across an interesting thought I've had and be able to get enough creative juice back to keep working on something else.  So...  Yes.  It makes me a better writer.
funny story but i actually found myself in that very situation recently, needless to say my mam didn't survive.
I don't remember what tutorial I used, but I have heard that [this guy](http://www.youtube.com/user/captnduck) makes some good video tutorials.
Observation: All the women have much bigger eyes than they do in the real picture.
ah thats too bad, good luck on your search, I would keep up the search on the internet, people will try and make a buck out of anything I'm sure there must be places with wacky art for sale.
Upboat for you sir...
No but I know when I need a shit I push the doors of toilets to see if one will open, I know it sounds like a crazy idea but it allows me to find a place to drop trou. Also if the door is bust I use my foot to stop it from opening, pro tip.
You sound slightly nuerotic.
[This](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KZtPhvJQ7Eo) weird ass Japanese commercial for chips apparently.
it's old
me. Im SubtlyDeadly
Everyone looks like sexual deviants; *job well done !*
For the love of god just fucking melee.
Don't be a dick
naw from southern california. 
There can be such a thing?
Remember, it's a Sunday, not a weekday.
Better come back...."Nooooo! Yooooooou!"
"Well there's your problem!"
Hmm, I can't tell if you want punk bands with girl singers or punk bands that are more "gentle." If it's the latter, The Smoking Popes and newer stuff by The Bouncing Souls might be good. As for bands with female singers, The Muffs are pretty good. 
I just want to see the police report, if only because you insist it's a true story and because I really don't want it to be true.
Lolololol hey everybody! Let's make a pointless thread about the ladder when there has been a clear answer written in stone that explains what he doesn't understand about the ladder! OP doesn't care about ladder yet he doesn't understand it, but he cares enough to make a thread with a rage comic. While we're at it, let's ask people who pissed in their coffees? That's not rude at all right?? He only gave him the answer to his question with the utmost manner. Let's also make a long and sarcastic reply to the person defending the guy posting the absolutely necessary post being asked why his coffee as been pissed on.  If you like the OP that's fine. Defending him while he verbally attacks someone isn't.   While you're at it, get the 13 candles for your birthday tomorrow.6
It'll eventually blow up in their faces just like the Digg Patriots fiasco.
Check out my prior posts for some others. And I usually slip off to the bathroom for a few minutes. 
For some reason I'm kind of down for the Grandma.
Not if you're in Florida!
"we should have shotguns"
I got an invite from someone else last night but they aren't accepting any more users currently.
[Wish granted](http://www.reddit.com/r/California/comments/icye3/attempt_3_at_a_new_logo_this_time_i_incorporated/)!
Something like this would work better with a different username.
This will be awash in a sea of comments, but Alphabeat - Fascination.
It got mainstream attention and success among mac owners.
Would anyone be interested in a website dedicated to these?
I Would Like To Join My Mc Is The Same As My Username.
If you would have read the rest of my responses you would have seen that I don't care if they marry or not.  They can do whatever they want with their lives.   But what's most important to every single person is a good economy so people can put food on their family's table, and that's what I think should be the priority and focus of our government.  You can't make a decision about marriage if you're dead because the economy and government failed you.
It has nothing to do with the fact she didn't have a boyfriend, in fact apparently she was already dating one of the guys at the meet. My problem is that it's pretty much impossible to get close to her unless I'm attracted to her, no conversation can be about anything other than fapping to her or her boobs.  I don't *like* being at war with other women, but there is this type of girl that must command all male attention around her and finds other girls a threat. I've been in this situation before where another girl was bitter and unwelcoming because another female appeared that might threaten her hold. I tried for about a year to befriend this girl but she would ignore me outright and pretend I wasn't there until I gave up. I see this happening again.
as far as job opportunities once i got out i feel like i got a bit lucky. i used a military only headhunter that recruits for the oil and gas industry. i was in contact with them during my last deployment and they had a job pretty much waiting for me once i got out. my navy paycheck stopped and my new jobs started it was that easy.   some bits of advice regarding that. what you work on will not directly relate really to any industry as the navy and other branches i assume dont want engineers or technicians, they take to long to train and move around. they have gone the way of automated test equipment for most I level facilities basically a very large very expensive piece of equipment that spits out a bad component ID after a battery of automated tests. you dont learn shit. as far as O level unless you are going to do contract work after you get out it is far too specialized. so i will say LEARN YOUR THEORY, the basics they will teach you about electricial/electronics. the NEETS modules they tell you to read. that shit is gold, it is basically EE course material summed up in navy document form. this will apply to all electrical fields of work.  once last tidbit, decide early which you are going to do, stay in or get out. dont flip flop and prepare everyday even your first toward that goal. the navy will on occasion brainwash you a bit with the patriotic stuff. boot camp will do this as you will see, everyone will leave saying they want to "do 20years" etc etc. the truth is if you know what you want you can be taking advantage of money that is there for you through you whole 4 years or more if you choose, there is tuition assistance(not your GI bill this is separate) for you to take classes 100% reimbursed. among other programs. also dont fall for the "fiber optic tech etc etc certification schools that try to get you to touch your GI bill early they are a ripoff. as long as you qualify based on service once you get out the post 9/11 GI Bill is pretty much a 100% and then some free ride to college. take advantage of it. good luck.
Could be real.  *On Thursday, June 30, 2011, David issued a challenge to a group of YouTubers. The challenge was that he would fly in the group to his house to play a Madden Football tournament. The winner gets 10,000$ . The challenge was issued to WoodysGamertag, xJawz, WhiteBoy7thSt, FreddieW, HaloAHoles, and WingsOfRedemption. As of now xJawz, WhiteBoy7thSt and WingsOfRedemption have accepted. WoodysGamertag has stated he will give a response after the June 30th stream of his podcast; Painkiller Already.*  [Source](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alki_David)  Not reliable as such, but who knows.
Nice double entendre.
Robitussin Max strength. It's 4oz and 354MG, no apap, no guaif, etc. Or Zicam Max(1.5oz, 391MG, or even Robitussin gel caps(300MG).
&gt;Shoveling money to students via loans is what made tuition so high that you can't do that anymore  Goddamn this is the worst and most false talking point there is.  This is why tuition is going up at public institutions (i don't give a shit about private):  1. State funding for higher ed has decreased in all states - what this means is that the less the state subsidizes your tuition...the more you pay! You were **protected from the market value** of your education by taxes...but in every state people kept electing "no more taxes" and "lower taxes" politicians, so instead of paying an extra $20 out of each paycheck they're paying an extra 10,000 to send little Jenny/Johny to school. GG.   2. Public institutions are generally research institutions. Research subsidizes pretty much everything on a campus - including tuition. This is how it works: scientist Jill writes a proposal and gets a grant for 80,000 for researching clams. The Uni scientist Jill works for takes a full **half of that in "overhead"**. Congress keeps cutting funding to the NIH and the NSF and NASA...so they have less money to grant out for research...meaning scientist Jill can't get more money, meaning the Uni's income drops. So, you don't like paying $$ to go to school? Stop fucking voting for less taxes and goddamn pay your fair share.
I agree with the "do it with someone special" remark. My two hookups were awkward and kinda full of regret (also sober).
did you wear a condiment?
That's a null point though.  Who's to say Obama isn't won't continue the same policies as well?  Obviously, your response is that Obama won't but by doing so you're now making comparisons between GOP candidates and Obama.  The point is, if I run for president at the end of WWII in Germany, should I be comparing myself to Hitler and as my central slogan "I won't kill Jews"?  It's not really salient because so will all my competitors.  Nobody is running against Bush.  People are running against Obama.  Comparing them to someone not even in the running is pointless.  It makes sense to say GOP candidate X will continue Bush's policies, but if and only if you say that Obama won't.  And then you're comparing Obama to the candidate, not the candidate to Bush.
Your gf is making you get rid of stock photography?? Good for her!  http://www.tineye.com/search/3688df71785e684b4c804d9e6a59ef640c105a42/
Runescape was the best MMO I played. And I have no idea why other MMOs try to copy WoW.
Why are lesbians bad at boxing?  (Hold up your hand with all your fingers pointing upward and drawn to a point as much as possible.) Because they all think you make a fist like this.
As my name is Drew I really want to steal this and use it for something.
Oh, I didn't mean reading "too much" Bukowski but reading *into* him too much—an opinion I hold because I view most of his writing as shallow and somewhat childish. Obviously what is "best" varies by the individual—and in truth just reading in general (as opposed to the millions upon millions of Americans whose idea of reading is Cosmo or Us Weekly) is best. But I do disparage the Bukowski hero-worship on these boards because I think it's generally indicative of the shortening of literary horizons.
Awesome, thanks!  Now if there was only a "I know this won't run on Mac, but I'm buying it for my future PC" button that would allow me to force purchases/downloads...
I didn't mean the evil part, I mean the near-superhuman charisma that leads hordes to follow them.
I hang my head in shame
And one might think these companies would then be motivated to improve customer service.  But we all know what would really happen.
Thanks for the response.  I was asking a legitimate question, without judging or playing the race card.  Still got downvoted, oddly enough.  But, I wanted to thank you for the clarification.  Cheers.
Love how he is saying that LoL only had 2k viewers in the SK vs Fnatic match, and HuK streaming can get like 5k viewers. The reason is that you have to pay to view it in an acceptable quality so instead people watch other stuff like TSM vs SK scrim with over 30k viewers, HotshotGG's stream had over 10k during the SK vs Fnatic match as well.
y u no upvote???
Chinese actually uses hollow out periods too. I also distinguish Japanese with its curved squiggly lines while Chinese is more angular. 
But don't you think living forever would get boring eventually?
If we were the only ones using the oil and chemicals we produce, the rest of the US may have a valid complaint.  But we aren't.
I can't speak for Jeffrey Tucker, whom I greatly admire.  What I can say is that some of the brightest people you will ever meet have spent many years pondering the question of Christianity...  So, it's not necessarily the case that fine argument points and cleverness will take you one way or the other.  I myself believe that anarcho-capitalism is more coherent with Zen, Taoism, and the idea of emergent or meta-intelligence.  Oddly enough, I wrote about this on my own blog just a few hours ago...  not plugging anything, just saying... if you're interested in the idea of meta-intelligence vs. supra-intelligence w.r.t. the way we interact and order our societies, you might want to read my latest essay on http://www.nationcrafting.com  I would be fascinated to hear Jeffrey Tucker talk about this, but I have a hunch that it's a subject he just knows in another way, without having to put it into words.  It may not necessarily even be anything about catholicism, except that it gives 'form' to an awareness.  What I've read from Tucker in relation to catholicism is more to do with sacred music, which is in itself a form that transcends words and reason, which is why I'm thinking about this. If you've ever read Wittgenstein, you'll know what I'm talking about...  Perhaps it just doesn't matter.  He's a fantastic guy, there's no doubt about that, a real breath of fresh air...  and he writes great essays on Misesian thought.  The fruit of his labour is there for all to see.  edit: I added "of Christianity" since the OP was a question, too.
Maybe I can help. http://imgur.com/6yjSdl&amp;7PWva?full
Well there goes my dream of being in the Airforce.
&gt;No hands? *She* just sucks the pee right out of my urethra? This sounds awesome!  FTFY. Wait...no.
Are you some kind of moron?
pretty much amazing.
somones a little angry? TROLOLOLOLOL
Played 2v2 with some friends, they had played for about a day prior. I picked Magmus cause he looked bad ass. I proceeded to get destroyed by Myrmidion screaming in skype about how OP that fucking fish was.
Your username is one of my favorite Flaming Lips songs.
I've updated the post with scans of the duals (among other things) if you're interested.
Very nice. Making me hungry. Might need to do dinner soon. 
You could also empty your inventory, except for dynamite, set the timer and walk past.
See?
If you *magically* remove 10' of crust, it would definitely collapse: there are plenty of preexisting fractures along which your now isolated layer of rock could fail.
Actually, it's more like   - make funniest rage comic in the history of reddit - inadvertently include one (1) typo in the text - 400 redditors concentrate on that typo and ignore the rage comic altogether - ***FFFFFFFUUUUUUUUUUUU-***
I was conscious, with a couple shots of novacaine when the Army Dental surgeon put this deal on my wisdom tooth that was sort of like a thumbscrew, or a vice.  Anyway, he turns it and there was a lot of pressure, and he turned it more, and it hurt a lot.  And the pain was truly amazing when the tooth cracked in two pieces.  
Not sure if OP actually saw movie  Or lying.
Is this supposed to be funny?  I could only make it through the first 2 minutes.  All he did was bomb.  I think this video is actually ironic.  Shows what a fucking joke congressional meetings are.
why are redditors so fucking idiots..they all memorize their fucking inside jokes? wtf,,get a life bitches
I'm lucky to have been born and raised in the West. My friends leaving Islam in the Middle East aren't nearly as lucky, and I hope the apostasy police doesn't ever catch on to their trail.
Not sure if anime joke.  or dick joke.
I'm just going to leave this quote from A Wrinkle in Time right here:  &gt;"We hold these truths to be self-evident!" she shouted, "that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their creator with certain unalienable rights, that among these are life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness."  &gt;As she cried out the words she felt a mind moving in on her own, felt IT seizing, squeezing her brain. Then she' realized that Charles Wallace was speaking, or being spoken through by IT.  &gt;"But that's exactly what we have on Camazotz. Complete equality. Everybody exactly alike."  &gt;For a moment her brain reeled with confusion. Then came a moment of blazing truth. "No!" she cried triumphantly. "Like and equal are not the same thing at all!"  &gt;"Good girl, Meg!" her father shouted at her.  &gt;But Charles Wallace continued as though there had been no interruption. "In Camazotz all are equal. In Camazotz everybody is the same as everybody else," but he gave her no argument, provided no answer, and she held on to her moment of revelation.
Blocked in the UK :(
Heh, yeah we did more questions, but the Burger King quiz definitely took the cake. 
Man, trolls don't even try to be believable anymore.
You guys should schedule it earlier if you want even more viewers. People like myself that are from EU have to stay up until like 3:30 in the night to watch it.
Reddit reposts content from all over the internet with minimal amounts of original content, only seems fair that Yahoo does some of the same.
My apologies! How does [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/California/comments/icye3/attempt_3_at_a_new_logo_this_time_i_incorporated/) look.
This, this, 1000x this
Is his face crooked or is it the hat?
Then I suppose when he provides proof that he wasn't there at the time he should be able to get the charges there dropped and possibly a false police report charge against her?
The first time that happened to me, I yelled "it stole my shit!", and made a stranger crack up while pissing.
Why don't you change gyms?
DAE despise Contador? I love the Schlecks. 
I'm beginning to wonder if the primary thinking behind these people at these legacy media institutions is how they can fuck with us to the maximum possible extent.   For the love of god relegate the legacy media to the dustbin of history already!
my new desktop background
nope.  no poop dick.  although i do have a story about that from another girl years ago.  this girl was smooth sailing.
Neutral chaotic. He lied to the Hawaiians. Chaos ensued.
Myspace Tom is on Facebook. I freinded him ironically. He doesn't appear to have a clue that no one ever uses myspace anymore. 
All of Us-Arts the Beatdoctor  Ociffer Down-Swordplay  Eat, Sleep, Repeat-Copeland  Chapter 6-Efterklang  All Alone in an Empty House-Lost in the Trees
Looks kinda like a big daddy from bioshock :)
[Don't Be Shy - Cat Stevens](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6ycjX3rLzyE)
Yes, Yes it did.
Clip is from a [Canadian PSA](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ugTeOz7rsgE). There are several others.
That isn't what credit card companies are doing. Wikileaks is not a protected minority and it isn't racist to deny them service.
I wouldn't call it "extremist", poorly written fiction yes, but "extremist" no.
It always takes me a furth try.
that's absolutely the right call. things like this happen all the time. you just have to apply State Based Actions and move on.
Women are attracted to confidence, for some reason. The nice nerdy types usually don't have confidence, especially in High School because your teen years are custom designed to rob you of it.  Assholes are confident.  Why men generally don't give a shit if a woman is confident or not is something I can't explain, but it is what it is.  If you're a 'nice guy' type in high school, just try acting like you've got a handle on life even if you don't. And don't act like girls are mysterious space princesses or something that you have to be all storybook around.  Or, yanno, date uggos. They're better in bed anyway.
So it's better to chase them down in front of everyone yelling at them that they're rude and that their mother didn't raise them right?
Yes ma'am ;)
Þetta er óþarflega harkaleg fyrirsögn en takk fyrir að koma þessu hingað.
I've never really "got" active pickups before, I don't think that it's worth the hassle. What's your opinion on why they're so special? 
wow, thats powerful stuff. i can't even relate; i mean, i know how a messy breakup feels, and this must be a hundred times worse.
not sure - i'd say up to 3 time a day - average about 2 - so 14/week  Edit: how often do you?
Yes.  There can be other causes.  I have some work in the field, and all I know is that these *can be* "consistent with" abuse.  It is something to rule out and you seem satisfied.  I do hope something helps, be it therapy or counseling or just time itself.
Whatever, this city is only 2 kevin bacons deep. If you don't know someone at the party, they probably know someone you do. 
i dont think any communities want this joke
Particularly these two comments were helpful to me: http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/idcg0/reddit_what_exactly_happens_to_a_country_if_it/c22vnlc
Your roommate is letting you know that he would like very much to sleep with you.
Agreed
Fucking love it!
Yeah, when I've taken over some subreddits recently, Krispy even removed the old mods from them completely.  So, if you're nice, she'll do it for you.  I'm sure.   But please, be nice.   
sometimes the face is all you need to show your reaction
I still can't get a straight answer out of anyone on why it's a bad thing or why they're against it.  I've been going back and forth with edubation about it and I've gotten as far as he's against it because he thinks it'll discourage pics from hitting the front page.  So far, though, he's the only one who's even attempted to actually explain why instead of just ranting about censorship or free speech.
Just to compliment AaronGNP's suggestion, most popular electronic artists nowadays use sidechaining extensively to tie their bass and kicks together. Basically, the volume of the bassline drops out whenever the kick hits, so they're free to occupy the same frequency range without really interfering (volume-wise, at least). Both tactics work, so it's really just a matter of preference.
Jerk off  Get high  Jerk off  Jerk off while high  Jerking off in a high place  Get high then jerk off while your in a high place
Please post this in r/relationship_tips. 
Speaking of cumshot fails, there used to be an awesome video of two dudes with one chick. She's sitting, riding dude A and blowing dude B, who is standing up.  Then B starts to cum, and misses the woman entirely and does it all over A's face.  A is pinned under the girl unable to do anything but make a hilarious face.  It was on stile project a few years back but I haven't seen it since.  [derp, it was the next video](http://www.efukt.com/33_Bad_Aim.html) NSFW, obvs.
TWOOO PUSSIEESSS.
She does not find you attractive enough. She must find a more attractive male specimen. 
tempt fate, not faith.
It's there to make Reddit look like it's being fair and just to the political opinions and leanings The Mob Mentality, Liberals, doesn't like while not actually having to do anything.  My opinion, for example, gets taken from the front page immediately because I offend the Liberals. Which of course is not what an American freedom loving forum should be doing.
Hey beef. I was thinking the depot would be best as well. 
I have never applied shampoo twice in my life.. hmm..
It's not that the girls are doing anything wrong. But boys in the same situation aren't either.
Square Enix re-re-releasing a game? Hope that doesn't become a trend...  /sarcasm
haha...not everyone craves food. some just crave attention. i'm not saying attention is a bad thing, but i'd rather crave food right now. (: ha
[Maybe this can help](http://www.tesnexus.com/downloads/file.php?id=22282)
Inherit the Wind is an excellent play! My favorite believe it or not -_-
Make a bomb threat happen in every building around the twin towers on September 11,  2001 at 7:00 am
The best part of these threads is that you come out with a bunch of new macros to use.
What?
Don't get it?
As was I. What an amazing concert! :D
There's never really that much in there.
Gotcha. Thanks for the help. Im actually wondering if I get cough and splash it around. I mean it was 13 bucks and it rips. No complaints except that!
buy a linen drop cloth to lay underneath it, and then lay newspaper on top. Anything that misses that papers get caught by the cloth, replace the papers whenever they get gross, throw the linen in the wash every now and then. Its also nice to have two linens drop cloths, so that you can lay a new one down straightaway when you put the dirty one in the wash.
i own a pair similar to these, i love them. I'm slowly learning how to walk in them, but have seen many videos of women walking in shoes like this, takes a lot of practice!
you two really enjoy talking about yourselves
near the end of jedi- "that's not james earl jones!"
What a dick
I would be interested in it, but what do I do with the metal? Obviously crafting but what can I make? Hats? Weapons?  Im sorry for sounding so noobish but this is my first time with trading. The game is a nice break from CS:S but this crafting thing is completely foreign to me.
Against the headboard.
Right, as I said, that's opinion.  Your argument is sound, but I deny your premise.  &gt;If choices are known in advance, they are predetermined.  I don't accept that.  To clarify, I don't accept that as you intend it.  Knowing a choice in advance does not remove free will from the equation.  Their choice will determine your foreknowledge before they make it.  Yes, that's effect occurring before cause.  I realize that's impossible within a normal physical framework, but so is foreknowledge.  Being outside of time enables both.
As the girl being cradled by the swamp monster, I must say you've really captured my essence.
The not douchebag was actually a recent Askreddit post (I'll be damned if I can find source though.) that was basically dudes preaching real loud way late at night, douchebag one was a post I made in /r/circlejerk a long while back, and douchebag two is something I do to people to screw with them, as a joke (though I've heard of people doing it before.).
Probably just a tattoo of the ship Serenity.
I am actually, trying to have it ready by friday :/
It is quite easy. My mate did it once on his way to America with me. I walked up to the counter. Gave them a receipt and left with cash.
Or if you're just cold...
TOR. I fired up tor once and checked out 4chan just to test a theory. I was right and most of the IPs were b&amp;. 
&gt; Remember there was people posting up on facebook how proud they were of the carnage they had caused. These are not good people who get caught up in the moment. They're bad people who saw an opportunity to be bad.  Think about this for a moment. Those were mostly guys in their late teens early twenties, they were high, they were part of a large group, many of them probably posted this while still being engaged or shortly after that. The adrenaline buzz of things like this can last quite a bit. I haven't heard of people en-masse posting these things a day later, this all seems to have been posted either during the rioting or shortly thereafter.  &gt; There's two things that keep society lawful; extrinsic motivation and intrinsic motivation. Those with extrinsic motivation would steal from you at the drop of a hat if they know they won't catch trouble for it. Those with intrinsic motivation will not steal from you because they know what you have doesn't belong to them, and stealing is wrong.  Yes, under normal circumstances where you act as an individual this is true. But the moment you get into a group that actually changes.   Example: If someone screams for help in an area with a large crowd the probability of someone coming to his or her aid actually **reduces** with each additional person in the vicinity. Personal responsibility gets cast off towards other people along the lines of: "Well, I don't need to act, there are so many others around if it really would be important they would act."  The same holds true in reverse as well, as you are in the middle of a group of people you are (or feel) close too your personal responsibility diminishes, you subject yourself to the groups actions and go with it.  The Stanford Prison experiment is an excellent example of that where "group anonymity" and a wrong sense of empowerment lead to serious transgressions.  &gt; Extrinsic motivation comes in the form of laws or religion, intrinsic motivation to do the right thing is entirely different, and there are a hell of a lot of people who are solely driven to remain lawful through extrinsic motivation alone. Those people were the problem at the riots.  Only that this doesn't really work all that well. The US has capital punishment in many States and yet murders are still being committed which is pretty much true for any other country as well. Any criminologist will tell you that deterrent by punishment or law does not work. Why? Because the majority of people by and large is not interested in going against society, the handful that is willing to go against society will do so in the believe that they can get away with it and will do it anyway. So "scaring" someone to "be good" is not going to work.  Furthermore. The moment you are in a group of people that all think the same way you do (in this case RIOT!) they become the dominant arbiter of what is permissible and what isn't. Again, this is why it is important to remove people who cross the line as quickly as possible before the herd mentality sets in.  &gt; You can't help it; every society has it, but it's very weak to turn around and say that it was spontanaity that caused the riots. I'll bet the day before in high school Nathan Kotylak was talking about how he was going to riot downtown if the Canucks lost... Same with the rest of those tools too.  Unless you can prove that though you're just wildly guessing without any fact to back up that assertion. Criminologist and Sociologist have spent decades trying to figure out why we do what we do and how we can manipulate the outcome, they all don't agree with you or the majority of the Monday morning quarterbacks.  It may be a hard pill for you and others to swallow, but the people who crossed the line on that Wednesday were people like you and me. Just like the hundreds if not thousands who crossed the line again over the course of the next week when they decided that they required payback and had a right to live out their anger.  BTW, that so many people had no problem uttering threats, committing potential acts of criminal harassment and stalking tells you something about how well laws work as a deterrent.
for the time it was released, the first DooM. asides from that, vice city. But I am not an ultra heavy gamer
I thought it was just me.  It really seems people want this phone to fail for some reason.  Its my 3rd day with it and I can say with confidence that this phone holds its own against the others and then some.
500 hours and I'm still iffy with my friggin rocket jumps.   After awhile that hour counter starts to become an indictment against your lifestyle. 
Whoops, I meant to delete about 3 of those. ~~Check back in a moment.~~ Can't delete individual images.
*Accurate as of: Tymo's sporadic updates... errr 30/06/2011*  **Group Name:** Not Safe For Raids (NSFR)  **Group Leader:** Tymoshenko  **Schedule:** Mon/Wed/Thur 10pm-2am server time.  **Goals:** To be as awesome as batman so I can ask me questions I always wanted to ask the real batman.  This group only exists so I can raid until that happens.  **Loot System:** Socialist Utopia  **What We've Killed:** 6/13 tier 11 heroics, 2/7 Firelands heroic.  **Current Roster:** Please go to our [forum](http://www.reddit-guild.com/?q=node/501), or alternatively look up "bringing sexy back" and you'll see our picture.   Now now, you might be thinking "But Tymo, I did look up Bringing Sexy Back and didn't see you? Only some guy in a suit." That guy is Justin Timberlake, and he asked to be our group mascot when I told him we didn't have any open raid spots.
my apologies but i had to demonstrate that i discovered this musician because of his need for a form check
On the other hand, I've seen plenty of comments on reddit talking about how fat people are, even when they aren't outrageously overweight 
Just got it printed and now it's hanging on my bedroom wall.
odd....the "ALL" is very important for this search, and yet none of the words appear in the reviews
"I know I will never love you" over MSN.   Joke's on him, now he's my fiancé! 
Whooo Killing Floor! Such an underrated game.
Here's a review of one of their cigars by ISmokeCigars: [redd.it/gebm4](http://redd.it/gebm4)
I have a friend that does Strongman competitions and his crew has been taking Tri Methyl Xtreme. They say it's working great. I just got a bottle I'm going to start on in a couple months. I'll pair that with CEL Cycle Assist and Milk Thistle and Revolution PCT afterwards. 
I'd do it.
Not gonna lie I actually laughed.
